My major issue with the books was that none of the students seemed like 16 year olds. I hate when people make that comment about YA books so let me explain. All the students live with French host families, but apparently none of the families have any compunction about letting their wards run around Paris at all hours of the night, none of them worry when the students come home drunk, and none of them even question the constant coming and going of new friends and acquaintances. A few times, the characters refer to their host parents, and two even mention that they share rooms with younger French ‘siblings,’ but still there’s no worry about going home drunk. It bothered me. I think the author could have made the students college age without much difference in the stories and avoided a lot of my qualms.
I’m off to a good start and I have great confidence that I can most certainly remember to participate the rest of the year. I assume after twelve months it will become second nature and I won’t need the “reminders”.
Disk Two
So various, so beautiful, so new,
My family is facing some major life decisions and I’ve found Discerning the Voice of God to be a trustworthy guide through the process.
There are -- I've read -- approximately 8 billion people on the planet. If that data is correct -- and I got it on the internet, so you know it is -- then, using my mathamaticotious calculations as a proficient songwriter, I see that approximately 7,999,999,300 people still haven't purchased my CD. Now I know -- from my other readings on the internet (and in magazines when I am in the doctor's office and I'm trying to find something to do besides play games on my phone in front of people) -- that at least a billion or two of those people don't have CD players or (I'm not kidding about this) even iPods. So those people have an excuse. Someday, when all is made right with the world, this travesty will be corrected and shoeless children everywhere will have access to Kanye, Ne-Yo, and Taylor Swift. Until then, let's assume that I have maybe 5 billion potential buyers on the planet.
The oft quoted saying that, “The definition of insanity is doing the same thing and expecting different results” has been attributed to Mark Twain, Albert Einstein, Benjamin Franklin and Confucius, but more likely came from Narcotics Anonymous literature. If anyone, the addicts would know the truth of this saying. Likewise continuing to try and live counter-culturally as isolated individuals will not work.
Buy these CDs if:
My tights, that is.
Here is what they had to say:
Chop Suey Books in Richmond, Virginia, is one of those bookstores that has crammed its stock into several rooms, which are located on both the street-level and the second floor. You’ll enjoy the sense of privacy as you browse the different part of the store’s collection and take in the view of Cary Street and the historic Byrd Theatre from the second-floor window. While you’re there, check out the impressive stock of art books on the first floor, which runs the gamut from how-tos to monographs to hard-to-find manga.
Firstly, I don’t see why we want to restrict children and can’t expose children at an early stage to two or more languages since their brains are literally like sponges. It’s evident how quickly they pick up – Mittens has already long learnt how to count from 1 to 10 in Spanish, and I had to Google it and commit it to memory just to keep up with him. Perhaps teaching too many languages full on might be a bit much, but exposing them to several words or phrases can’t do any harm. Apart from learning Chinese in school and at home, I’ve also been trying to teach him how to count in Japanese and French.
Northern California
Likewise, when the writer writes, s/he knows. Likewise, when the reader reads, s/he knows. Somewhere, somehow the dots…connect!”
Getting down to the bottom line now, although we all talk and share and project, can we also listen as well? Are we able to just shut up occasionally and really try to understand the message somebody else is trying to get across? I must confess that, when I'm in a hurry, I barely take the time to digest the input I've received. I'm so busy rushing from one thing to the next that everything just becomes one great, gray jumble in my mind, and I end up confused, annoyed, tired and disconnected.
Hey guys. Its me. Of course! I was reading ‘The Lost Hero’ (amazing book by the way) when I thought to myself, I haven’t made a regular blog in a long time. Or that is in bold font for that matter. So I finished the page and here I am. . . typing away. :O please read on. . .
I have already mentioned the phenomenon of Interpretatio Romana, but there is also the related phenomenon of Interpretatio Graeca, and really a limitless list of possibilities that might be entertained otherwise, in which one culture interprets the mythology and deities of another culture along their own lines. Sometimes, as in Julius Caesar’s De Bello Gallico, the names of the native deities are erased altogether, and he only speaks of the “Gaulish Mercury” rather than (as seems the most likely) “Lugus,” “Lugus-Mercury,” or “Mercury-Lugus.” We also get “localized” Roman gods, like Jupiter Optimus Maximus Dolichenus (whose altar in the Romano-British site of Vindolanda is shown above), which is the syncretistic and more widespread version of the Ba’al cult at Doliche. However, we also get many altar inscriptions that give the deity-names side-by-side, as mentioned previously: Sulis-Minerva, Apollo-Maponus, Mars-Cocidius, etc.
It's a last-minute break from snow's routine to Cairo,
Unequivocally, without a doubt need someone,
Like I'm a hidden angel hanging out somewhere unexpected, like over the doorway of a bar. Like this little guy.
“The mayor filed a statement with the Board of Elections that he would only make campaign expenditures through his campaign committee,” said one lawyer familiar with the case who spoke on the condition of anonymity because of the investigation. “But what might have happened here is instead of doing that, he gave personal funds to political parties to make political expenditures for him, and that could be stretching the rules.” G.O.P. Consultant Accused of Stealing Campaign Money
10 techniques
So, listen up everyone, tomorrow is Cyber Monday and you need to take advantage of these special women and their awesome sale just for the day!!!
Cause unto cause into the retro-cause of the spiral galaxies
When probed further on the matter: “We don’t need to inform, that depends on us.”
I don't have any pictures of Peter when he first came, but here he is after living here for a few weeks. The horse on his left is a two year old that is from the same place.
Finally, for my Reds collection, I am a Type 3B collector. I have tons of Reds cards - but most are unsorted (more on that another day). I also am somewhat active in trading for new Reds stuff - but not nearly to the extent that I trade for cards that I need for my sets (or even Barry Larkin cards)!
It said “Except with the approval of the Governor-General…”
“Ndlovu and those who believe they may simply grab another's land and that this land was previously part of Zondi's land are mistaken,” said Roodt.
Those days are gone
As for evolution and creationism than well you need to make that clear.
2010.07.27 Iraq Baghdad 1 4 A civilian is taken out by a roadside bomb.
Since my April 1 post about Albuquerque, in which I expressed my opinion about killing wild animals, each time I post, I receive a robot message from “GunRightsAttorneys” and ”LesleyCarter,” in an attempt to intimidate me because my opinion differs from their “cause.” I have been treating these as Spam.
I sleep with too many people at night.
you will be there for me without my even having to ask…
I've purchased the ingredients for my annual "Sherpa Porter," a Robust Porter that I keep tweaking the recipe on, every year. This year, I've tweaked it a lot, and I'm interested in the result. I'm going to shoot for brewing it this Sunday; it's the only chance I'll have for 3 weeks.
The Summer Show Project is open to all artists world wide.
About a month ago, David and I joined the band, signed up for a marriage course (Love & Respect, based off the famous book that was actually given to us a wedding present from our wise and wonderful friends, Natalie & Matt E.), and some how I got suckered into playing for the annual women’s retreat. Our lives have gone from Laing-centric surviving the day to day rat-race-lets-just-eat-dinner-drink-wine-and-watch-a-movie-again-honey to having engagements almost every night of the week. As a newlywed couple still honeymooning, it took a lot of will to give up that precious time of it being “just us”, but if anything our marriage and lives are the richer and fuller for it. We’re learning a lot from our marriage course, and have gotten to know some really great couples who have been living in Viet Nam a lot longer than us. We have made 10 new instant friends on the music team, and have been challenged to grow and take leadership when David was asked to sub as leader last week.
Phoenix Germaine has been trying to earn back her mother’s trust after going into rehab and kicking Onadyn-teh drug of choice for New Chicago teens. But when a party in the woods turns into an all-out battle with the most ferocious aliens Phoenix has never seen, she’s brought home in what appears to be an Onadyn-induced state. Hello, reform school.
So, on Friday afternoon we went off to Xi'an, a city that is an hour flight away. Here are some pictures from this beautiful, historic city. Xi'an has been the capital city of China in ancient times. That's why they have so many beautiful, historic buildings and it makes the whole city just so much more interesting.
How does Maya respond to all of this? Let's see:
I decided to order a root-beer float sno cone.
Learn about the basics of Radical Unschooling philosophy. See the learning in all that your children do.
Who knows where it will take us?
Laboratory based courses, summer jobs in laboratories and internships are essentially required to kick start your career. Science technician should possess excellent communication skills both in terms of speaking and writing, as they would need to produce their research findings in both the forms. Computer skills, an eye for detail and good analytical skills are the other requirements for the job.
He was starting to become desperate, he needed to find her, she was his golden ticket. He shouted out the color of her hair. It was the only thing his mind could grasp onto in its churning panic. As he staggered through a thicket of underbrush he considered all the ways he could get his hands on some quick money for another rock. He didn’t like doing hold ups, the risk of getting hurt was a lot higher then riffling through some marks purse while she was in the shower. He had worn out his welcome with the bleached blond over in Iowa. So he couldn’t tap into that anymore. She had started complaining she was missing jewelry. She hadn’t out right accused him of taking it, but she had started acting suspicious asking too many pointed questions trying to trip him up.
We need to try and break this cycle, fed by the Capt P and Dr G alliance. I know that is far easier said than done. Dr Google is far too accessible and Capt P ensures that his visitations are as distant as possible from our real life support. We must therefore make a concerted effort to resist Dr Google. Capt P will then be weakened in his efforts to derail our thinking. We have helpful guidelines, such as the 2 week rule (if a pain, ache or suspicious bump lasts for 2 weeks it needs to be taken to a Doctor). We have our online support. Oh, did I already mention that? I guess that out of the sinister partnership, Capt P could possibly be credited with having a modicum of use. He keeps us alert. It is critical for us to be aware of our bodies and any changes that could be significant. But to go any further than that sees him as a trouble maker who needs to be kept in his place.
Unfortunately for them, Chris isn't the shutting up quietly type, he began letting people know, even got me off my Twitter-duff, and gazillions of others, causing the #FreeChrisLoesch hashtag to trend worldwide several times (a big thing in the Twitter-verse). The Twitter people realized what had happened, that their automated spammer algorithims were being turned into Brown Shirts by the proregressives, and reinstated him... and had to do so several times to overcome their repeated attacks and get the issue resolved.
Did I tell you that she found her passport pouch? (Valuables Redux, Money Changes Everything) She did. But not before I’d gone back down to the main office and rattled a few young brothers-to-be with my sense of urgency. I’m sure it’ll turn up. I’m sure everything will be fine. There is nothing more annoying than a peaceful, reassuring person when all you want is results. The valuables slip I discovered late that nite in some nether region of my luggage, and waving in victoriously, declared. “I can’t go back there. I just can’t face that young woman again….” From there a shared litany of frustrations brimmed up through paroxysms of gulping laughter. “I can’t deal with any more German people telling me what to do…… I need whole grains……. I need a toilet at nite……I want to sing in English…… I want all these new people to go away!!”
I build me a boat of slivers;
"Lindsey Scott! Thirty-five, forty. Lindsey Scott! Forty-five, forty! Run Lindsey! Twenty-five, twenty, fifteen, ten, five! Lindsey Scott! Lindsey Scott! Lindsey Scott! … I can't believe it, 92 yards, and Lindsey really got in a foot race. I broke my chair. I came right through a chair. A metal steel chair with about a five-inch cushion. The booth came apart. The stadium, well, the stadium fell down."
Davila said that the head of state will defend the position of the member countries of the Bolivarian Alliance for the Peoples of the Americas (ALBA) that Cuba must be present due to a principle of sovereignty and respect for the right to self-determination of the peoples, the newspaper Cambio reported.
Men are like pebbles
He believes the “older you get, the less you like acting. Directing is more fun…Acting is one of the paints, the director is the painter.”
Middle: Eek! A Shark!
"...What?"
I also decided to move around some light fixtures in the house. I'm getting not one, but TWO chandeliers above my dining table. Then I can really smack around some friends when we sit down to play monopoly deal. Have you ever played that? I highly recommend it.
The next motif and those following will be:
This body implements policy proposed by the European Commission and discussed by the European Parliament.
Sadly, I was not able to go in more than once, as my hip decided it couldn’t cope. So, I had to walk around the outside and watch the fun instead of joining in “insert very sad face”.
Anything valuable since hospitals tend not to provide lockable cupboards and you may have to move to a different room quickly so items are easily mislaid.
Current flavors are as delicious as ever, skewing more savory than sweet. Toasted almond, vanilla bean, peanut butter glaze and coconut glaze are tossed in with organic orange, Valrhona chocolate and the always yummy blackout and tres leches. There's just too much immoderation involved.
Don't I look all professional in that photo? (Actually, don't answer that...)
Mother’s Day
Carved window & door details onto TARDIS tile. Will paint "Keep Calm & _________" (something incredibly clever & Doctor worthy) on tile base. Washed out a bit, to seem weathered. Drilled two holes for hanging. Plans for many more.
Here's a couple of sneak pics :
"The coldest winter I ever saw was the summer I spent in San Francisco."
Cottage and Vine
The road along our route was almost deserted, other than the free-range cattle that wandered onto the highway from time to time. Although we did see an occasional car, the drive was very quiet and peaceful.
If you don't like pickles (dill, that is) then you can skip this post.
She had wrapped up in cellophane a beautiful Gift Basket but in my eagerness to open it up, I forgot to take a picture of how beautiful it looked. I could really kick myself.....
Iran‘s main export markets for oil are in the Asia-Pacific region – principally China, India, South Korea and Japan, which would think carefully before ditching this supplier to support the EU campaign.
Much laughter followed and I promised that I would, indeed, look up the site when I got home.
The acting like a baby role is old! You are not a baby, as much as I wish you still were your not. We had to buy you new sippy cups because you refuse to use “big boy” cups now. You want your food exactly how Chloe has hers. God forbid you get your pizza and it’s not cut up just like your little sisters. You’re a big boy! Your going to be 5 this year and I just wish somehow I could get it in your head that being a big boy is cool. Being able to do things like mommy and daddy is awesome. I loved doing all the baby things for you when you were a baby. Now it’s just annoying. Because not only are you wanting to be like a baby, you whine and when you whine, I want to punch a wall, or the car steering wheel or anything close enough to my fist! Whining is not going to get you what you want baby boy! It’s only going to get you in bed early ; )
Then on Thursday a public meetings is being held to discuss the Remploy Closures. The meeting will take place at ULU, Malet Street, London WC1E 7HY – download the leaflet for more info (PDF).
Oklahoma-Whale hunting is strictly forbidden.
…BPD sucks.
When the sons of Zinyemba saw this they planned to kill Hundungu. The elder son, Tumwe, took his sister called Magopo and many cattle, sheep and goats to Chinamora said, “This woman and these cattle, sheep and goats we give to you Chinamora. We beg you to send your warriors to kill Hundungu because he took the chieftainship which belongs to our father Zinyemba. Our father Zinyemba died on the way when he was going to the chief of the vaRozvi, he beg him to take the chieftainship of Mangwende from Hundungu and give it to him. Today we have come to you. We want you to send your army to kill Hundungu.” when he had heard the sons of Zinyemba he answered, “I will not accept this woman and all these cattle, sheep and goats and I will not send an army to kill Hundungu because Hundungu was confirmed by your midzimu. Your father tried to go to the vaRozvi and he died on the way. This means that Hundungu was confirmed by your midzimu.”
"Is 'enough' a lot of money?" she wanted to know.
Even the host had to tell him to shut up!
Does Stick Shift tickle your fancy too?
NOTE: Wisdom is before him that hath understanding; but the eyes of a fool are in the ends of the earth
How do you get a creamy risotto if you're a vegan? Well, Johanna supplies the answer - you use cauliflower! You boil the cauliflower until soft and then blend it with some of the cooking water and stock powder. You then proceed as normal in making the risotto and near the end add in the cauliflower mixture. Brilliant!
Way!
Though hands down the best exhibit was the showcase of dresses from Downton Abbey. I was very happy that we were allowed to take pictures and I took way too many! Expect to see several posts with detailed and close-up shots from some of my favourite outfits from the first season including the Dowager Countess' purple and black suit, Lady Sybil's harem pants suit, Lady Mary's burgundy gown, Cora's cream suit with black braid trim, Lady Edith's white dress and Mrs. Isobel Crawley's black dress.
More often than not, we do find people who understand us, our stories. But once in a while, you meet someone who understands you in exactly the same way you wanted to be understood. You have said as much, I think, but it is eerie how we are in the same page sometimes.
On the eye - A Champagne-resemblant pale gold translucency.
made iridescent by the filtered light.
Five days from home, the track the characters are following swerves past a low hill, obviously artificial, made out of black, polished rocks. Should any character touch a rock, a woman with black hair and dark eyes, dressed in black-embroidered clothes and wearing a cape of fur from a black bear, will accuse them of being thieves and attempting to steal her stones. Once they protest their innocence, she will call them liars and curs, then will demand they undertake a trial to prove it. Either they will be tried by hot water or by combat.
Sway your hips
When I have a chance, I’ll transcribe and share their beautiful parables, but just for today I take comfort in the fact that they are getting what they need: they’re getting Life.
Truck truck
Quite the deal my friends, quite the deal!
04 Formulae
I greeted the caller, “Drivethroughguy, how can I help you?,” in my best professional phone voice. A young man replied that his balls were swollen and he wanted to know what to do.
Jeanne (Willow Tree Stitcher) held a giveaway for her blogoversary and I was one of the lucky winners! I was so surprised when the package arrived. She made a gorgeous rose project bag and included in it a fantastic needlebook and added a package of needles (Bohin a brand I was wanting to try) and a pair of sheathed Ghinger stork scissors! And the scissors have a fob that match the stitched piece inside the needlebook! Everything is just wonderful! WOW!
Here’s to the crazy ones. The rebels. The troublemakers. The ones who see things differently. While some may see them as the crazy ones, we see genius. Because the people who are crazy enough to think they can change the world are the ones who do. - Apple's 1984 commercial "Think Different"
I find it kind of unbelievable myself.
little, by little, by little, by little…. see a pattern?
For coffee, we recommend Divine Coffee, in High Pavement. Good atmosphere, excellent cup of coffee (we actually went twice in the end and tried different brews!), and a friendly pair of guys running the place. Ashe, the owner, only bakes on certain days, and we hear that his cupcakes and tray bakes disappear in hours, so you’ve got to be lucky to hit the place at the right time. We missed out this time, but we’ll be back for sure.
Interviewer: For homosexuals and lesbians – the punishment for a woman who favors women, and for a man who favors men.
"We always wanted to be in showbiz, but never thought it would really happen. So although it was kind of an accident, we weren't overwhelmed, we'd thought about it, and had prepared for it, in a way. And we know about the work you have to put into sustaining it. You're gonna be hearing about Salt 'N' Pepa for a long long time."
Thanks for dropping by today, I'll see you soon; in the meantime Happy Crafting!
A common taunt against those who are in straits or suffering (see Psalm 42:3, 10, 79:10). While the question is not directed towards Jesus explicitly as he hung upon the cross, the words of the Chief Priests, Scribes and elders express the implication: He trusts in God; let God deliver him now, if he desires him; for he said, `I am the Son of God’ (Matt 27:43).
“Unfortunately with the growth and the size the company has gotten to, the alarms are going off to where we have to figure it out or do something else,” Bell said. “I don’t want to sell, but it’s a great time to sell if I had to. There are many willing buyers. "If it was just a family business, there would be legal maneuvers we could make that would facilitate that kind of transfer across generations. With its current structure, I'm not able to do those sorts of things. It would basically leave us in the position of selling the company upon my death." He states later:
Most nights I steal a few pages before the battle to keep my eyes open is lost. This bundle is currently sitting at my bedside, some of them just finished, others a work in progress, some needing to be re-started.
For the non-Lusophile, I regret to inform you that are missing out on quite a bit here and subtle wordplay that translation just can't get at. Listen to how well the lyrics, vocals, and arrangments hang together and reinforce each other.
This applies to ALL formats of the work—that would include eBooks.
Super Mario Bros. (SNES)
A crusty ciabatta, delicate salad and grilled meat will add up to a
This is because we know that beneath those layers of op shop puffer gilet and cereal magnet facial hair is probably something genuinely magnificent protecting itself from not just society's expectations, but the motherfuckin' cold, mate.
Violet D'Mello, from Aberdeen, was with her husband at the Kragga Kamma Game Reserve in Port Elizabeth, South Africa celebrating her 60th birthday.
My new role at work has been mostly challenging in good ways, but it’s also been a little rough around the edges. I think after last Friday’s workshop things should improve and I won’t feel the need to get up and take a walk whenever the phone rings.
So, at the age of 18 I met an adoption counsellor who went through things I had already gone through in my head. We went through my adoption papers again. The details were:
The West Virginia Farm to School Conference in September 2011 brought together 92 attendees, from farmers to school food service directors to facilitate conversation and build connections in this important arena. Sponsors and partners of the conference include Potomac Headwaters and WesMonTy RC&Ds, Center for Economic Options (CEO), WV Department of Education’s Office of Child Nutrition, WV Small Farm Center, West Virginia Food and Farm Coalition, and the WV Department of Agriculture.
I sure have seen ALOT of lovely products & can't WAIT to get
There's also a Wikipedia article "Flow Chart" so that kids can see that there are many hands involved in the process.
Who would ever have thought I would be spending a holiday weekend at Skywalker Ranch, home of myth and legend? Oh but I did. There were animals, large amounts of barbecue, free drinks, relay races, and hay bales.
Score: Carrie-Ann=7, Len=8, Bruno=8 for a total of 23 and a grand total of 62
And flew on those dun wings under the sun
number of military and police
That's it for today- tomorrow I will have pictures of my VERY clean and neat craft room to show you- its' hard to get motivated to create anything because I know it all has to be spiffed up each day since we are trying to sell our house! Here's keeping fingers (and toes!) crossed!
That's how I REALLY know that somebody gets me.
And just now, I pulled my CITY WEDDING introductory story down from Amazon and Smashwords. It’s going to get some very light revision, as well as some supplementation – such as a character synopsis that will, I hope, highlight the fact that the story’s purpose is to introduce a series (which was never clear enough before.)
The Millennium Clock
If you prefer to give the gift of a writing workshop-- my next one starts in January, runs for six weeks, and costs $300. If you email me before the 20th and tell me the secret code (which is Rebound Eats Dante's Poop) I will give you a $50 discount.
I: Right.
2. Post on FB..
20Now when Joshua and the children of Israel had come to the end of their war of complete destruction, and had put to death all but a small band who had got safely into the walled towns,
Season with the black pepper and serve.
I think she doesn’t smile becuase she is worried about getting lines around her eyes.
of fighting Germs to keep our children healthy and
6 April 1829
In my last review, I talked about how much I enjoy the Sam Adams brews...and now I'm going to talk about how I don't enjoy all of them. This was also included in the winter pack or brewmasters collection...I can't remember.
06:00 – 07:00 Crypsis
Just how odious this little Afrikaner nation has become and how unforgivable her political transgressions were, is further illustrated by the following: The second half of the twentieth century has seen many cases of national apologies being made about war crimes and genocides to the descendants of its victims, in an effort to heal the deep festering wounds of the past. One sad exception is the refusal of the Turks to confess the brutal genocide of a million Armenians just over a century ago. Around the same time though, the mighty British Empire committed unspeakable atrocities on the prairies of South Africa against the world's smallest white nation, because this tiny nation happened to stumble upon a big pot of gold! Yet no British apology has ever come forth for the forced starvation of 28 000 innocent women and children in British concentration camps between 1900 and 1902, in spite of the fact that all Britain blushed in shock and shame when it was revealed. The only reason - I presume - for the absence of an apology is the fact that the poor victims happened to be. Afrikaners! In fact the British Commonwealth's nonchalant attitude toward this forgotten war crime is well illustrated by the fact that a proud Canadian city could name itself after the main perpetrator, Lord Horatio Kitchener!
What you need for the box are 5 pieces of cardstock:
We're hoping to send the overhead cameras out for a proper run tonight - cross your fingers for us please!
I just love the ambition that this girl shows. Not to mention, her stamps are adorable. I wanted to help promote her talent, so if you are a stamper, go on over the The Pink Elephant and check out this new line of stamps by an awfully talented little girl. She probably doesn't want to be called little but....
However he said that Gadaffi's leadership would probably shift the AU's priorities away from its humanitarian and environmental work and "more towards science".
In other news we are still looking for a rental, there really is nothing around at the moment and I'm not even being picky, 3-4 bedrooms, fully fenced yard and built-ins are the main requirements, it's amazing how many houses don't have built-ins, very annoying!
Robert will remain at the Santa Corona Hospital for two to three weeks. A decision will then be taken about where he should go in order to continue his rehabilitation.
With the combination of the resident demonstrations, enhanced legal efforts to shut down porno palaces, complaints to the police at all levels by community organizations such as the McManus Democratic Association, and an influx of tenants at Manhattan Plaza, slowly the tide began to turn in favor of the residents and against the pimps and prostitutes. An important milestone came when one of the more notorious burlesque houses between ninth and tenth avenue was shut down through the efforts of the midtown task force. The question was what was going to replace it.
On the dog-hair covered floor. At least it was pasta and not a steak! Pick-up-Stix anybody? Ha! Remember that game or am I showing my age? hee hee
The ship took on a very slight list to starboard. We did not know it at the moment, but we learned afterward that the iceberg had ripped open probably four of her larger forward compartments on the starboard side; and also that if we had only hit the ice head on, instead of making too late an attempt to avoid it, the ship would in all probability have survived the collision.
Now, we can start construction. Oh... boy.... hear my cries of enthusiasm.....
This whole ordeal begs the question, is where you are really the smartest thing to advertise on your social networking sites?
And that’s it. You and the recipient of your note will be emotionally closer, all because of a little thoughtfulness expressed with pen and paper.
BUDDY xxx
This morning, the Irish Government has quite rightly said, more or less, “Right – we’ve done our bit, we’ve taken the pain, and we haven’t given up. Now we think the rich countries we’ve saved should fork out.” Excellent: we should get behind the Irish, because they alone are showing some intelligent bottle – and they alone have made a genuine effort. If I were Nigel Farage, I’d be on the first flight out to Dublin this afternoon with a wind-up mechanism.
Or perhaps, not.
2 Heat vs. 2 Thunder, Thunder win series 4-3.
So anyway, they have this category called "Worldwide Act" (of course, for the European Music Awards o.0) and they had several categories, one of them being the Asia Pacific category, which lumped all the major Asian bands into competition (or their fans) to get the most votes to win the category of Asia Pacific to compete against fans all over the world for the Best Worldwide Act award.
In any case, I now officially proclaim my love for the CBC. I think that we, as Canadians, should listen more. I think that we, as Canadians, should be proud that we have such privilege to have access to such content.
Oddly, what got the most attention was the green colored water in the toilet bowl (green food coloring). My girls still can't get over that the leprechaun had to "go potty" before he left our house.
Finally, my chance to run away with Joel Hodgson! Don't tell Lee...
In English, ‘good’ English is ultimately whatever way English speakers actually speak and write the language. The French are heading towards a dead language; ironically, they are stifling it by trying to protect it.
When I came back from university, there they were, still building houses. Always said ‘hello’, always happy to stop and chat.
I love my kindle as well as my new cover! I can now bring my kindle to work! I also figured out how to be able to download kindle books from outside the US. I’m now subscribed to Amazon Prime 1 month trial so I was able to borrow books for free. Yay!
I think of it like I do my marriage. I know Tim loves me. I mean...I know. The man is crazy for me. He is a card carrying member of the "I Heart Sheila" club...and it has a membership of one. He laughs at all my jokes, and still chases me around after 25 years and 10 pounds and 2 grandchildren.
“No one asked me for change.” He looked back towards me. “You know why they asked you that?”
Carry On, Jeeves, et al. – Wodehouse
Post Graduate Career Education
I'm not one for making a big deal for my birthday. It's not a major one - yet. That's very soon.
But I was already falling away. Her hand brushed my arm. But she was too far to grab it.
I’ve been trying to wrap up all my Christmas shopping by the end of this week. I plan on spending the time off I have doing fun things around town with the kids, not last-minute running around in crowds. I HATE crowds. LOATHE crowds, actually. I also can’t stand shopping unless it involves margaritas or shoes for me. So, I’ve been doing a lot of lunch-hour power shopping and stopping in to a single store between picking up the kids and heading home. The other day, I needed to run into Macy’s for three very specific things: handbags for Smalls’ teachers. I knew exactly what I wanted. I was a woman with a coupon and a mission.
(root_nsu1c308)@/parag/pkgs/vxvm4/4.0/sparc # pkgadd -d VRTSvlic
For all projects, budget is an important aspect. Keep track of progress and the bills accumulated. There should be a budget projection for each stage. An example :
Shoprite is situated on Victoria Island and are busy concluding agreements for stores in other areas of Lagos and other cities in Nigeria. Shoprite caters for a wide variety of customers by ensuring we remain price competitive whilst offering excellent quality products.
throughout. Jones died in 1999 at age 37 of a rare blood disease.
The reason why it shine, twinkles so bright
In another comments thread on a post by Michael Rosen on what might be done to encourage the enjoyment of reading, commenters repeat the view that it's the parents' responsibility to teach children reading, not the government (and this is why age-banding is such a good thing: to help parents in this task). Well, I don't know which world these people are living in, but in the one I taught in for several years and in which my partner still works as an educational psychologist, there's a whole population of kids out there who don't and/or can't read because their parents don't or can't read and in some cases, particularly with boys, actively discourage reading as effete and middle-class. There's a very thoughtful post over at Juxtabook (recommended by one of the Guardian commenters) which I too would recommend to you as a wholly accurate and moving depiction of the relationship such children have with books, but I disagree with his conclusion that age banding would be useful to their parents. In my view it's about as useful and attractive to them as fags to non-smokers, because they simply won't be going into bookshops in the first place. And Simon Juden of course knows this last - it's the already book-oriented classes (and the publishers' golden goose) which age banding is targeting.
Bill: For sure. For me yeah. Hundred percent…I can say hundred percent yeah. I would love to…
May the memory of our fallen be for a blessing for all of Am Yisrael. Yehi zichram baruch.
3 Sweet Dragon 5:35
Mostly, I just spent a lot of time with the bride, Kristen, and the two other lovely ladies in our group of Wide Whales, Joy and Rebekah. The Wide Whales is a story for another time, but we have homemade t-shirts, just so you know. I know so many of my posts lately, have been photo heavy. Will try to cut back on that.
Time: 18:30 to 19:00
And to the cry he sped;
The agreement:
Thank you very much to all of you that left me - and the rest of the girls, such number of sweet comments!
In the meantime, the rush of Titanic remembrances--including a pretty great on on the National Geographic channel I caught up with last week--might spark a little interest of days gone by. Before we know it, these will be days gone by too. I hope we can learn our lessons well enough to do better in the future.
Cockney : "Allew, eez everbody ear?"
Thank you all for participating and being so awesome! Hope I didn’t disappoint even if I pulled a fast one outta left field on you!
So, if the little people are doing it and the big people are doing it, why aren’t I? I am stupid, naive and foolish because I expect to pay a fair price for a fair product and for the government to take a fair share of any transaction in order to look after me should I fall sick, fall victim to a crime or fall out of a job. I am stupid, foolish and naive because I expect more than the most base from others. I am foolish, naive and stupid because I expect to be treated with dignity, honesty and respect.
The weekend is a time when we can be spontaneous; more time to spend, less need to plan, n'est-ce pas? Roasting a chicken for dinner? Add some small potatoes and carrots to the mix and you could have a simple dinner for four. Maybe your planning on making pasta for dinner? Easy enough to make another box and have a simple dinner for six. Don't have dessert? Vanilla ice cream sprinkled with some finely ground coffee and a splash of scotch will have your guests oohing and ahhing.
28) HIGH WALL – The Wailers
After you have exchanged glances and smiles across a room and you are fairly confident that SHE thinks that she might like to get to know you better, send a drink to her. But remember that ALL you are buying is a drink. Don’t expect her to fall at your feet. Sometimes it is nice just to send someone a drink, watch when she receives it and smile, then look away – look back again later to show your interest.
I've mentioned the local online mom group that I have been part of for the past 5 years or so. Through that group, I've seen and been part of some amazing things, some dramatic things, some fun things. I've made some wonderful friends and connected with women who are compassionate, passionate, and determined to be the best moms they can be.
The Krewe of Bacchus carries the various celebrity monarchs and is known for its elaborate floats (and its great souvenirs -thrown indiscriminately to the crowds who are shouting "THROW ME SOMETHING MISTER!")
I hope some got the message and before chasing again immigrants , think the above story.
I finished these murals late Friday night during a tremendous rain and hail storm and so the entire school got a bright surprise today when they came to school!
45×5
And the most amazing thing happened.
When such exercises yield their maimed and misleading results, when the polls deliver “doctored” figures, it is not only the popular will that is disfigured.
Right now they don’t.
Amount Requested $28,800
Anyways, here’s the bottom line using Edwards’ terminology: I think scholarship is honorable and integrous as an ultimate end, but not necessarily as a chief end. I think that scholarship is even acceptable as a subordinate end, as long as the greater end (or ultimate end) is honorable and integrous (such as teaching others or developing a greater love for God). And I think scholarship as a subordinate end to a greater/ultimate end of anything self-servient or self-praising is ignoble and disintegrous. I wrote my original post primarily as a self-reminder to engage in scholarship as an ultimate end (i.e., to love the game and not see it as a means to something “greater”). But I also wrote it in part as a criticism of scholars who may consider scholarship (subconsciously or consciously) to be subordinate to the greater end of obtaining fame, notoriety, praise, wealth, or any other ignoble reward (not that I personally know of any–this should not be seen as a criticism of anyone in particular).
they can give you back your hope,
Here’s hoping it’s not made you grim or sick.
Jonsi: Really?
That I don’t belong
Since I have so many images I want to share here, I'll refrain from my usual barrage of verbosity and let the photos speak for themselves.
A close friend has kindly provided some interesting weather facts for Saint Saturnin Les Apt for the year to date (starting in February)
( ) make sure you're not involved and get rid of any troublesome documents before a real investigation starts.
Each year, 19 billion catalogs are mailed to consumers across America, gobbling more than 53 million trees and creating 56 billion gallons of wastewater in the process. Visit www.catalogchoice.org and opt out of unwanted catalogs. Within 10 weeks, your mailbox will be taking a lighter toll on the environment. Less waste, less pollution-it's just that easy.
I didn’t get it at the time. But in a sense, Cashen was waving the white flag for those great 1980s Mets teams…this was the end of the road and it was time to rebuild after a fun trip. Other fans tend to agree with this sentiment, by the way.
And our friends? Well it’s not been a straight forward path to lose that regained weight. Life is a constant journey of renewal and movement forward but never forget the joy a quick peak back can bring to remind you of just how far you’ve come.
Q: Anything which the members have done recently which made you happy?
I loved that job. I really really did.
You have been hiding so long,
Alex was in Kenya about 25 years ago when he was in the Navy. My son also got to Kenya as a port of call during his Navy days.
Evaluating open source alternatives to Microsoft Office
I sobbed through the whole song, and when it ended i turned off my car and got out. I was like a robot.. i put the key into my front door and shut it behind me. My house was cold and lonely.
It is very pretty for vintage style homes & would be so wonderful for weddings.
Commander, US Pacific Command (’07-’09)
Story blurb: Fiction writer Logan Brandish is perfectly happy in his peaceful small-town routine with his best friend, his cat, and his boyfriend—until he meets the editor of his next book, the handsome Brock Kimble, and the lazy quiet of everyday living goes flying out the window. Faced with real passion for the first time, Logan becomes restless and agitated, and soon his life and his new manuscript—a work in progress he’d always thought would be completed—are in a shambles.
Surprise on Mother’s Day!
Potential Insights: Could deliver some information on how hard people rate TM and how they see themselves within this big competition.
My lazy Internet research revealed that 80% of Pinterest users are women (thanks ignitesocialmedia.com!). Over at Google +, they are running close to that equivalent, male.
“But I have a triathlon…”
For the past few years, during the October Break, we’ve rented a cottage for a week in Yorkshire. Not only is the countryside beautiful, but it’s a few hours drive closer to my father, so it’s an opportunity for him to see the grandchildren and for us to catch up.
Many social sites can and will reveal your location when you upload images and status updates. If you’re not where you’re “supposed to be,” it’s a good idea to skip the uploading process until you get home so as not to instigate an argument from an ex, or soon-to-be ex-spouse.
It’s more important to have a pleasant relationship between the in-laws, so while etiquette dictates that the host of (paying for) the wedding is listed at the top of the invite you may want to find a compromise that makes everyone happy. Here are wedding invite guidelines:
And then he added: “domestic workers are raped in the boss' and madam's bedroom but they cannot say anything because they will lose their work.”
NORTH PARK. This is more reachable and affordable. At first you would think this restaurant offers Western meals. Well, there is more to its name. I’ve eaten in North Park several times already and I must say it is one of the better Chinese restaurants in the city.
We all have periods when it seems everything goes wrong: life enters cascade failure, and one crisis after another piles on. You’ve probably met someone who just seems cursed. A personal loss is followed by a car wreck, then a flooded house, then an illness. You start to wonder which god they pissed on to create such calamity. You pity them, but you fear them a bit too. Stand too close and lightning might strike. Conflict is a rule of life and fiction, but fortunately there are good times as well as bad. Even the bleakest existence is mercifully punctuated with a bit of hope.
*Quoted from Wikipedia on The Gift of Fear.
Is this the only reason why we are concerned? No – there are other reasons:
So how do you use a polarizer? Easy, attach it to your lens and look through the viewfinder to see its effect. Polarizers are designed to be able to rotate while attached to the lens. Rotating it varies the effect. You can just experiment by rotating it to see how much effect it produces. For blue skies, the amount it affects your photo (if at all) depends on where the sun is located. Basically it works best if the sun is directly to your side (left or right) and somewhat lower in the sky. Polarizers have less (or no) effect when the sun is directly overhead or directly in front of or behind you.
I love everyone's versions of Sleek in Silver.
Segregation was the order of the day following slavery, and frankly, it was working far better than integration is working today.
Thanks for looking! Merci de votre visite!
I'm a tad surprised at how much of what I saw in the magazine I would still happily wear, although perhaps 12 years isn't all that long ago. Still, with the Kurt Andersen essay in mind, I feel like it's not a bad thing that not ALL clothes have evolved and innovated beyond recognition - surely sometimes good design endures to become a classic?
Not because of their footballing prowess. Not because they'll be playing in the Intertoto Cup against a team from Eastern Europe whose name has too many vowels in it. And not because they're going to sell Gareth Barry to Liverpool.
The conversation finished with....
3) Pass it along to 10 people and let them know the have received a nomination.
So, when I say I went off my diet, I mean that I’ve pretty much only been eating saltines and gatorade for two days. Today (Thursday) I ventured into plain oatmeal and chicken soup territory. Needless to say I have not done my workout since Monday afternoon. Luckily, I no longer feel as if I’ve just been runover by a semi-truck, however, two days of “fasting” will suck all the energy right out of you. I’m hopeful I can get a workout in tomorrow, but I’m not sure how hard I can push it.
I was crestfallen - the prom queen deflowered and unrespected in the morning. “Come pick me up,” I said, pretty sure I needed that to be a double entendre.
Apricot Blossom - a peachy orange taken from the lighter parts of the orange flower to the left of the lady - 241.192.123
Preheat oven to 350 degrees, racks in the top third.
• Seven Dials and the former St Giles slum, Soho. An notorious slum of the 19th century, this area was among a number of “rookeries” or slums toured by Dickens in 1850 in the company of Inspector Field and police from Scotland Yard, and later helped to inform much of his writing. Seven Dials itself – located at the junction of Mercer and Earlham Streets and Upper St Martin’s Lane (pictured right is the monument at the junction’s centre) – has just undergone a renovation but much of the St Giles area is now irrevocably modernised. We’ll be mentioning another notorious slum located in Saffron Hill, Clerkenwell, in an upcoming week.
Shooting finished up with photos of the living room and the exterior of the house. I was lucky to get a parking spot immediately in front of the house the day before so I could back out of the shot when they were ready to take it.
damage’s done
Ms Fong Lim was quickly criticised by incumbent Graeme Sawyer and community groups, who accused her of demonising the most vulnerable members of our society. Lord Mayor Graeme Sawyer said Ms Fong Lim was taking a cheap shot at Darwin's most vulnerable in a bid to score a political point. "Itinerants and homeless people are part of our community too," he said. "It's very cheap for someone to come out and say local government should come out and do something about this."
"Tell me, Madame Imelda, who is the most important female in my future girlfriend/fiancee/wife's life?"
Departure time from Singapore: 3am at Terminal 3
She twirled her necklace once more, tucked it under her shirt, finished her coffee and left. Something told her they'd be back. Something told her she had to get the blood off the carpet before her lease was up in June. And something else, something faintly reminiscent of her mother's voice, told her that her father had something to do with it all.
It’s safe to say I’m a planner, not a pantser
**NOTE** They are only a good one if they send you back mistakes and are honest enough to tell you if something does not work. Send them a Rolex if they have the gumption to tell you something sucks.
Pastor at El Rincon de Villa
--that time the rain let up enough that we were able to run outside and "play football" with Hudson.
Also - the photo I have used in my Timeless Layout is of a good friends daughter and was taken by the very talented Sandie Mallon Pop over to her website and have a squizzy at her stunning photo's!!!! :)
They seem to have an innate understanding of basic physics, Cassie lifts her feet high and sticks her little pudgy legs out straight when mad granny pushes her round the room on her little car at great speed, and closes her eyes tight when something flicks towards her face, and yet they seem to be able to see things which are not there as well, the imaginary cup of tea or the sound from the little car horn…
Though he speaks no English, Kaiyu's has improved a lot and he acts as interpreter for us. Qiang introduces to other artist friends in equally enormous neighbouring studios. They all work with various aspects of abstraction on a large scale. In fact the Shanghai School is primarily an abstract movement, very well known and very highly valued in China and abroad. We tour the studios, greatly impressed and determined to argue for a Shanghai School exhibition back in England.
As the days go down more and more I keep buying more and more stuff to take with me.
licking lips
My website http://www.margaretreyesdempsey.com/ provides one-stop shopping. You can read about The Benefactor, hear the latest news about my journey as an author, find upcoming events, access my personal blog, print photos of me to hang on your refrigerator (kidding), access links to buy the book, and send me an email. I love to hear from readers and respond to all emails I receive.
So today, I started Weight Watchers.
That's what I mean about burnout. I'm to the point where stuff like that just grates on me. Just … argh! Why sign up for a parent participation preschool if you're not going to participate? So you can sit around gossiping about shoes or which crackers have palm kernel oil?
large vegetable garden, and I kind of want to pass that tradition on.
He tried to take a step towards us – faltered... His eyes widened. He seemed held - kept back.
So, I've banned myself from watching HIMYM reruns until I'm all caught up. I'm currently on Season 3.
sliced green onions
A: … bovine.
Many on the tour didn't understand, at first, that the men who will be housed in the BDC will not have been yet convicted of the crime for which they were arrested.
Max is going for his Grade 0 assessment at St David's next week Tuesday which I am really upset to missing. I can't believe he is going to big school next year. Here is a picture of Max the night before I came to New York.
Night farmer is pulling starlight
Want depth The next thing she said was to outline what else the student does with their time which was, for example, taking care of a sick family member, going through major changes such as a move, medical conditions that impeded them, or if they work a part-time job. These speak to a person's life outside of school and life outside of formal extra-curricular activities done with groups or teams.
October 14 – War Memorial Coliseum, Ft. Wayne, IN
The last person who comments will win the bundle with the lavendar ribbon!
Organisers plan to put up thousands of placards around the UK claiming the season of goodwill is responsible for rape, teenage pregnancies, abortion, promiscuity, crime and paedophilia.
The tag won’t mention that the fur coat or boots you’re considering buying are made with a tabby cat or golden retriever, but they could be. A lot of the clothing in America is imported from China and some of the fur products are made from “mans best friend.” The cats and dogs that we love so much are killed in grisly ways for the cost of fashion. This evidence has caused an uproar of people boycotting fur; a hopeful outcome for a tragic situation.
I guess the moral of the story here is don't be an asshole unless you know for sure that the owner of the company is not sitting on the bus with you!?
The witches commanded the element of Water and the sea responded. The sea changed the course of its currents and bent the Gulf Stream closer to land. When the Spanish ships weathered the northern points of the Scotland they were pushed north and east; closer to the coast of Ireland than they had hoped for.
One of the primary discussion topics at this year’s upcoming Bilderberg Group meeting in Chantilly, Virginia will revolve around how the elite plan to address the issue that threatens to bring their agenda for global governance crashing down – the euro crisis.
--Tracy Boyland (at right)
Despite the sunshine it was dark in the forest, the thick, interwoven mesh of branches blocking all but a few shafts of light. Lord Fuckington was by now deep into the woods. Apart from a grouse which he had managed to pierce with an arrow from a distance of fifty yards and which he had then used as a fleshy, blood drenched glory hole he had thus far had little luck. Still, he plunged onwards. His blood tingled, the heady aroma of sap and decomposing leaves as if heavy with potent, the distant chatter of unseen songbirds whispering a secret for him to decipher. He felt that as if at any second something wondrous would occur. The sensation drew him deeper and deeper into the forest, further and further from the path.
Im burning the midnight oil - an update on the pending carriers (you will know if you have one ;)), they are ALL started, and will be out very very soon!
I didn’t have the time to add a single word to this after my walk, but before work today. The sunny day only lasted a few minutes of my walk, then a light rain began to fall. As is often the case, a very light, warm rain seems to make wildlife more active, I think that birds love a little rain. They put on a few shows for me, the photos I took aren’t top-notch because of the lower light during the rain, but I think you will find them interesting enough to make up for the lack of quality.
I give this book 3 stars. It was an enjoyable mystery. It did have it's slow moments, but it didn't last long. I think this book will also appeal to those that like contemporary YA but want that little extra "strange" element within the story.
Just to be clear, I adore beautiful, classic black and white show clothes. My color love is for schooling only.
My sweet baby is so thoughtful. I hope he always stays this way or that I can at least remember these moments during the days he is not acting so sweet. ;)
A little bit about me: I LOVE adventures and stories of Happily Ever After. I have found my freckled prince and he treats me like a Queen. I believe in love conquering all.
Shocked, Theodore immediately called for the local doctor, who hurried over to the Brandley house to care for Marie. The patient he left to answer the urgent call had typhoid…and the doctor did not wash his hands afterwards…they just didn’t understand this simple safeguard yet…
I am in awe of this particular teacher, who still remains in control of her mini-class:
10 weeks seems like the shortest and the longest amount of time, all wrapped into one! And at the end of it all, I get something so so so much better than a Mickey Mouse watch, the latest Nancy Drew mystery, or a pair of snowshoes (although I do still really love the snowshoes my mom got me a few years ago, so that’s saying a lot).
I had a nice early night planned for my hubby and I in front of the TV but instead i was lucky enough to spend the night in Hospital!
Designer Buttons Neutral Collection # 119743 - $8.95
Genevieve offered something more. She was 25, three years older than he was, born in 1958. She kept a journal, as he did, and thought of herself as an observer, as he did, and brooded about her identity, as he did, and had an energetic, independent, and at times exasperating mother, as he did, and burned with an idealism to right the wrongs of the world, as he did."
Talking, eating and farting
-RR
This position is expected to continue for _1____ years work or pending continuation of grant/contract funding.
It occurred to me that in my life I have not been in the habit of dreaming in a terrifically big kind of way. What I mean is, all up until last year, my biggest, I dreamed that one up myself dream was to see U2 in concert. Not because I am so in love with them, but because of all the non christian music in the world they are my hands down favorite. So, MOH got us tickets and we went. I mean, I could have really started thinking about what I really want to do in life as a thing for me. It has been mildly depressing since, in a way, because, I can’t think of anything I would do for myself. Maybe that means I am just happy where I am.
Interesting grammar fact: The second version of the Trindade monastery was destroyed in the Great Earthquake of 1755. (The original, inaugurated in 1325, burned to the ground in 1708.) Its neighboring hilltop monastery, the Convento do Carmo, also suffered great destruction in the quake, thus wiping out the two most notable buildings of the entire neighborhood and leading to a saying that is still used today: Caiu o Carmo e a Trindade (“the Carmo and Trindade fell”), which is invoked to describe a great tragedy.
indeed...
Don’t use “would” just use past tense. She would change diapers daily – she changed diapers daily
All this talk brings me to tonight. Imagine my horror when, on our way home from baseball practice, my youngest son informs me he has a bloody nose. "Gah!" I thought upon hearing this. "GAH!" I cried when I glanced in the rear view mirror and saw the geyser that is his tiny nose. There was so much blood it was as if Dexter Morgan had set up his kill room in the backseat if the Hyundai (because we clearly learned nothing after the Cavalier...)
To keep the carbs coming, I decided I wanted to make Bavarian "Bretzen"... otherwise known as Soft Pretzels, in America. Thanks to my lovely blogger friend, Monica, of "Lick the Bowl Good" I found the perfect recipe. Her stellar photos showed how to shape the dough into the pretzel twist. She promised they were fast and easy-- and I needed that. I had been in the kitchen for almost five hours and I had 90 minutes until the guests arrived-- could it be done by then? The answer is "yes"! I didn't photograph each step, because I was running out of time and energy. The steps were simple, and you can find a printable recipe at the bottom of this post. You start with warm water, sugar, salt and a packet of dry yeast. In five minutes it was foamy. Using my Kitchen Aid Stand mixer, and the dough hook, I added flour, and melted butter. That's it! In one hour, the dough had doubled...
-Remove from pot carefully and serve hot with the your favourite dipping sauce.
Two of the men had grown up near the swamp. In their youth they had spent countless hours in aging canoes and on foot navigating the vast bastion of cottonmouth, rattlesnake and alligator. The blood coursing through their veins might as well have been as green as the emerald slurry that flowed slowly and quietly through the Okefenokee. Their lungs seemed perfectly formed for breathing the sultry air. Their skin appeared to naturally repel mosquitoes and leeches. The two were swamp rats in every positive sense of the word.
Don’t think that “all things” are just physical possessions. These verses come directly after Paul profession of who he was, before He was in Christ; he was Saul:
This article is about punishment involving pain, not designed to cause injury.I imagine inflicting pain without injury is like throwing water on someone without getting him wet. As in, it's not possible. If you are hitting your child, you are hurting your child. If you don't like hurting your child, you can stop.
Begin to hammer the head of your spoon until it's as flat as you want it to be
Dear BB, I hid eggs inside the house because it was snowing when I came by. Have lots of fun and see if you can find more eggs than your mom and dad. Oh, and enjoy the chocolate!
I adore steel tanker desks and one would nip my storage problem in the bud. Rehab Vintage in LA has some that are new and others that have been refurbished. I'd love to get one in a fun color...probably turquoise or orange. Here's the standard gray, which is also neat.
For the price of just RM39 (if my mind serve me right), it worth of trying!! If at all it doesn’t suit you, please don’t hesistate to send it over to me. I like free stuff..Hahaha..
I got a little autumn-happy and changed up the colors on this here blog. I love everything about this season, and I am super excited about the pretty leaves that are already changing up here in the North Carolina mountains. And the scarves…and boots…and sweaters…and jeans…and…everything else :) Somehow in the fall I always find that I have less cold-weather clothes than I thought, so I head to the J. Crew outlet a little too often.
Syria’s uprising began a year ago with peaceful protests against Assad, which were met with a fierce crackdown by security forces.
That this is what life is all about!!!
Home Improvement Service Companies and Liability Issues
“What’s your best guess?” Hood asked. “You think they’ll move along?”
Bilboa have the highly rated Fernando Llorente and Iker Muniain to lead their attack, although due to suspension, defender Fernando Amorebieta is misssing after picking up a red card in Althetico’s win against Moscow in the last round.
Spinach, Young Savoy (Loose)
Myra: "Mmmm. I love this cake."
5) Preheat oven to 350 degrees.
This one is very springy, and the flowers were all punched... quick and easy! The movement of the flowers is so delightful!! When you open the card they just dance :) It surely brings a smile to your face! The tutorial on how to make these cards is on my personal blog.
Why not? How cool would it be to work in a place that lets you bring your well-behaved pooch to the office? Or feeds you lunch in a great cafeteria for free? Where you can have a treadmill desk or a take a spin class in the afternoons? A place to plug in your electric vehicle? On site daycare and preschool? A "quiet room" where you can just unplug for a few minutes? Yes, there is a small percentage of businesses that have cultivated a sense of fun in the work environment, usually in the name of team building and creative thinking due to some kind of expensive corporate consultancy coming in to boost productivity. It's rare that the fun concept is an everyday part of business culture. I'm not talking the recreational eating, once a month birthday cakewrecks in the break room that are served up to us as "fun". I'm talking about your job being one of the joys in a fulfilled life where your office is a place in which you and your colleagues do your best work ever. Every day.
In the midst of all of this fun, I'm doing some fun scrappy stuff too. Sunday is my card class that I shared last time (still some spaces left!) and on Tuesday is this USA Banner class I created using the new Liberty line by Bo Bunny.
Throughout the night, Lasher finds himself having to bribe cops not to shut the party down (neighbors are complaining about noise). Corinna gets up on a table and tells everyone about her husband "O'Reilly" and the hard times they went through ("It was eating too much and drinking too much that made me lose my shape, and that's how I became a chanteuse").
﻿After taking this class you will have learned all of the basics of scrapbooking as well as some simple techniques such as inking, tearing, and using embellishments (and if you have no idea what any of those are then come take my class!). Everything will be provided for you; just bring yourself, two pictures, and a tape runner (which can be purchased at the store). I promise I don't bite! =)
Monday, 5/21: Stuffed peppers and salad
I OFFICIALLY hate snow.
Maybe it would help me transition into Fall.
I did not expect that I would use it all day long as I had expected to use my Plantronics as my main headset, but I like wearing it. Another bonus is that you do not have to talk loud to be heard by the other party.
Plain and simple, most businesses don’t realize the severity of what’s on the way. The amount of companies or agencies that have not attempted to narrowband or even understand what it is are a huge concern of ours. Our daily searches on the FCC’s website lead to thousands of users who have little knowledge of narrowbanding. With the deadline less than ten months away, our concerns will be not only that people don’t narrowband, but that those typical radio users may become an interferer (with regards to their frequency). On top of which leads to hefty monetary fines.
And, finally, this is our climb back up!! This was the half way point...god, it's rough. Just seeing this picture makes my legs burn!! I need to be more active :(
Day 6, Part 2
North Korea is perhaps like a floundering gambler with no target. It has changed little since I first went there in 1986. Except for the small matter of mobile phones, presumed ICBM tests and the possession of nuclear bombs.
I wonder what write-up our present bunch will get. They seem startlingly unaware of what history teaches.
It remains to be seen whether Australians want a political leader who, in making policy decisions that will affect humanity for next thousand years, discounts the research of thousands of published scientists in favour of unsubstantiated and unverified anecdotal data.
“Humans can serve witches, vampires, angels, demons, and fey,” Sundance said. “They have to have the tattoos put on by a human tattoo artist, but often the master will pay to have it done. This way the magical world knows the human belongs to them. There are a handful of humans who interact with the magical world despite having no powers.”
“What’s your best price?”
This list was compiled as a way of helping other people understand pregnancy loss. While generated by mothers for mothers, it may also apply similarly to the fathers who have endured this loss.
Whether or not the development agreement was released, abstracts of the development leases released in September indicated that the developer would have 25 years to build the project.
today was not a very good day.
7. Kissfreak Steven - "Ice Cold Hut"
keep my love in flower,
zest and juice from 2 limes
Well what is this that I can't see
I then kept the yoghurt sauce simple, but with a beautiful balance of flavours. The toasted, lightly crushed cumin and fennel seeds offer up a smoky warmth with a hint of aniseed, and the coriander adds the clean, fresh, herby taste to the sauce. The addition of the tamarind-date chutney and the chaat masala add sweet-salty-tangy flavours, and the hot chilli powder offers up the hint of spice that just brings the whole dish together so well.
Caroline Andersen (27) is the name on this fresh and liberal Norwegian blonde. She is the singer in the rock band Caroline and the Treats - see video.
When she was alone in their lodge, she sat and cried for her loom. When she had cried enough, or all she could, she took a piece between her paws, began to gnaw.
Zinnemann’s decision to cast Gregory Peck as Artiguez (a role originally meant for Quinn) caused bitter sniping amongst critics at the time. They didn’t take too kindly to seeing Peck cast against type as a crotchety old Spanish mercenary. Richard Schickel complained in Life magazine, “What is needed is the internal stimulus of a powerful performance from Artiguez… what we have instead is gentle, attractive, intelligent Gregory Peck, an actor who sometimes smolders but is quite incapable of bursting into angry flame.”
Look, most of the dwarves have beards.
That must be the worst scenario for a writer, by the way, to lose access to their keyboard. Typing out blog posts on an infra-red rubber keypad attached to an iPad just doesn’t cut it long-term, take it from me. I tried, and only managed a couple. (It’s quite good for reading, though).
As the parent of a girl who was bullied in middle school I know how difficult the situation can be. Will contacting the school make it better or worse? How do you support your child when the people they are required to spend hours with every day are making them miserable? How do you deal with girl bullies, who often use non-physical methods of torment which are much less obvious but no more less destructive than they physical abuse favored by boys? The psychology of bullying is complex and the roots are found in the families, schools and society that have caused children to feel that having power over someone else, making someone feel small and helpless, singling people out because they are different and punishing them for not conforming makes you feel strong and important and gives you power in a world where you ultimately have very little control. Because those who bully have usually been bullied, by other kids maybe but most likely by the adults in their lives. And as with most kids they have grown up with very little control over how they spend their days, who they spend them with, what they eat, when they sleep, when they stand up, sit down, talk and even when they can use the bathroom. These kids have been belittled, demeaned, disrespected and neglected by the very parents and schools that say that bullying must stop. And this probably confirms that that I am a part of the lunatic fringe but I contend that the bullying starts at the top, you know, with the government. No child left behind really means no child shall not conform, and every school district must do whatever it takes to ensure conformity.
Ecclesiastes 1:18
But the real issue for writers (and for me) is understanding how this fabulous technology affects the publishing industry. Over the last several years, we've gone from raised eyebrows and sniffs over self-publishing to a rapidly growing market that big names now enter.
Ute Nanninga
no i lied about that second one haha
I found a half cheese and a smaller peice lying where someone dropped them, and that made me wonder, so I went to look at the castle market stall. No cheese! And it does seem to me that the produce there has gone down quicker than normal, so I went to see the castle kitchen staff. The cook told me that food has been stolen from the kitchen there too, but not the eggs, for a change. No, the eggs, they have just all turned bad before they could even be collected. They even checked the ones that the poor hen was sitting on, and they had gone bad too. Poor mother hen, sitting there for nothing. It does seem to me that that must be the work of magic, by someone who means people no good, for that is just not natural. Seems someone tries to starve us out, or at least gain power over us. I keep saying it, but no one seems able to hear.
Anyhow, that’s the update.
Kiss Granddaddy for me and for Gram.. let his mustache tickle your cheeks and your sweet fingers... and give Jesus a hug every day because He loves you so much too. You are such a special girl, and you are still my baby.
Mikaily: "I want pink!"
kingdom
Behind the scenes, behind closed doors I have been battling... Teeth. Lil Cs to be precise.
If …then.
We know from exit polling on California's Proposition 8 that blacks see gays as second-class citizens, but does this civic form of disenfranchisement also manifest itself in less genteel ways?!
Ok, so to say this blog has been neglected is a MAJOR understatement. Here are my excuses:
However, passages like the second verse of 1st Peter 2 pose a problem for that theory. The Apostle Peter tells the early Christians what to desire: “Like newborn babies, crave pure spiritual milk, so that by it you may grow up in your salvation. (NIV)” This verse is a command. The craving is to be the result of a decision to be obedient to the head apostle.
mix cd....or ipod.
It's called a challenge because it is a daunting task indeed. Participants post every day of April, skipping Sundays, writing posts on subjects A through Z. Last year I chose literary terms, and yes there is a literary term that begins with Z.
when i stopped by the shop, owner arthur frank who is generously hosting the event told me that a package had arrived for me. we opened it and discovered two children’s books. for the party, i’ve asked guests to bring one new or gently used children’s book to donate to reach out & read illinois, a foundation that tries to put books in the hands of needy children.
Not one solution valid given yet -
On the nose - Granary loaf oats and seeds. Faint straw. Rather yummy.
Anyways, Shiro and I are actually pretty good at resolving our own drama given enough time. Problems generally stem from the fact that both of us are hugely insecure and have terrible self-esteem which results in miscommunications or outright lack of communication. Which is funny, because so much of our relationship is just being completely blunt and honest with each other.
Once you have cored and peeled and quatered all the apples , stage 2 is getting all the apple quarters thinly sliced, then in thinly cubed.Think 1 x 1 mm !
If you want to succeed, you should invest some time and effort to plan and figure out your actions.
hm… This book is really hard to give stars to… I really want to give it 4 shuriken stars… because both halves of the story are around that standard (maybe the first half is slightly better), but when they are put together… it just doesn’t work?… It’s like taking a goldfish and putting it in melted chocolate to swim…; the end result is just a dead goldfish and chocolate which tastes fishy… IT JUST DOESN’T GO TOGETHER… (sorry about the capitals… this book just really frustrates me…) I guess I have to give it 2 and a half shuriken stars… Because although it is up to a 4 standard, in writing (well the first half)…, fishy chocolate doesn’t taste good…
“Eighteen years later, I’m rehearsing the role of Father Jack in Quotidian Theatre Company’s production of Friel’s Dancing at Lughnasa…”
Kohler Barnard claims to be in possession of nine affidavits from police officers who attended a meeting addressed by Mkhwanazi on March 5. There he is alleged to have told fellow officers that he once witnessed a suspect being shot and killed by the police, but that such incidents were not
Expected Publication: April 24, 2012 *HAPPY RELEASE DAY!!
However when I was looking through my remaining Arizona photos, I saw a couple of sunrise over the Grand Canyon which just called out to be used with this week’s throwdown… After a deep breath, I pulled out the Navy and got going…
A good way to add books to your home library is to visit the gift shops when you go on an outing. A few weeks ago, when I took my kids to the aquarium, I let them each pick out a new animal book on the way out. This is a book my daughter has come back to many times in the past few weeks. She can almost read it by herself now.
The last male bastion of America’s war machine, The United States Marine Corps, is going feminine. Say what you want to say about me. Women are to be put into combat units by an incremental plan which will eventually put them on the front lines with males. It’s only a matter of time, now. With thanks to Drudge, here’s a report from the New York Times, of course, which lays out the grand plan to help advance women’s careers in the military by assigning them to units that were once male-only. And the rationale we’re supposed to buy is that this is just a sort of pilot study, to see how well America’s women function in those assignments, with an eye toward eventual co-ed combat operations. You see, making war is all about equal oportunity now.
- Stevie Ste Ste, Manc, Manchester, 01/3/2012 15:59
The next grad activity is on 24th April. We will meet at the school at 6:30 and go to Dooley’s then Dino’s Pizza. Cost is $5 due on Friday, April 20th.
5) Princess Charlotte of Monaco
For the Israelites, with transgression comes impurity. Throughout the year the Israelites, by transgressing their covenantal relationship with God, slowly pollute the Tabernacle. The impurity is drawn to its opposite, holiness, invading and collecting within the holy space. This jeopardises the holiness of the sanctuary, therefore, as the impurity increases, it also jeopardising the presence of the holy God in the midst of the people.
While you are there check out the fabulous inspiration from my lovely team mates.
As a side-note, I would like to mention that without exception, every reconstructionist that I’ve ever met who is also in any fashion mystically inclined, or who has a strong and deep devotional practice, ends up being syncretistic in some fashion or other. They may not invoke two different culture’s deities side-by-side in a given ritual, or include them in the same prayer, but they deeply and enthusiastically devote themselves to the practice of devotion to different cultures’ deities and different religious practices when and where appropriate. And, they do so within the tradition of each deity and each culture as fully as it is possible to do for the culture concerned, based on the available information and material. I am reminded of something I heard on television once, which may have been stated by Robin Williams on Bill Maher’s Real Time, which is “Mystics always recognize each other; fundamentalists only see themselves and sin.” While this may be true of monotheistic religions more than anything else, it seems to be true where these matters are concerned within reconstructionist polytheisms as well, at least in my experience.
No sewing tonight! I did watch a few shows I had on the DVR. I got plenty more to catch up on but I might save those for the weekend.
Green chilli (long) - 2 or 3
16. Reggaeton Latino - Don Omar (Puerto Rico) / 3:26
We wish you the best of luck with everything and will continue to keep you in our prayers.
Mama, you forgot the flash on my big day!
VERY careful where she steps.
And most important; chin up.
Let’s not be fooled into living out this crazy deception but Let us fix our eyes not on what is seen, but on what is unseen, since what is seen is temporary, but what is unseen is eternal.
3. Frazzled Five is a super fun blog written by an amazing mommy of five! Stop by her blog to be biblically inspired and to read all about her fun loves for life!
Abby has given a mixture for a big batch, where the mixture can easily be stored and measured out in batches as and when you need them. How very convenient! She has also given the measurement for one single recipe and I chose this instead. One of the ingredient used is buttermilk, which I do not have, I just substitute with a mixture of milk and yoghurt.
When you assist at Holy Mass, offer our Saviour’s precious blood to the eternal Father, beseeching his Divine Majesty to receive the blood of his only Son, which you may offer as belonging to you by his free gift. Beg him to take it and pay himself therewith, for what you are indebted to him by your sins; and ask victory over them, and pardon for them. Have confidence that he will grant your request for his dear Son’s sake, but acknowledge that having so long continued in sin, you deserve to die in it; nevertheless hope in the precious blood that pleads for you, and demands its price and salary, having been shed to cleanse you from your sins.
The old man reaches down to stroke my hip. (See — this is something you could never get away with if this were official government business).
All of these are under £20 in the hope that I'm not the only one watching the pennies this holiday...
Vanessa did not sitting around sulking, like Eeyore always did whenever Christopher Robin would put his tail back on, saying "No matter. Most likely lose it again anyway."
Once they are out of the oven let them cool. I like to sand the edges a little with some sand paper. May sure you brush away all of the crumbs.
Its a good thing that we talked about this cause we could not of been further apart from one another. I was thinking that hers was going to involve a specific place, time of year, maybe some romance and feelings, probably some candles or potpourri. Ok shut it, I read Cosmo!
All for You (Full Band Version) 3:39 Sister Hazel Somewhere More Familiar Rock
Now that.. that feels right.
1. Who?
"In proceedings for infringement of the exclusive right conferred by a registered Community design, does the right to prevent the use thereof by third parties provided for in Article 19(1) of Council Regulation ... 6/20021 ... on Community designs extend to any third party who uses another design that does not produce on informed users a different overall impression or, on the contrary, is a third party who uses a subsequent Community design registered in his name excluded until such time as that design is declared invalid?
3% 0 8 Rahr White Wheat Malt 34 5
Drawing the air into lungs this wind
I thought you loved her.
Bearing this in mind, it’s rather puzzling that the Left in Norway find the ideology of the Counterjihad community so despicable and hateful, and one can of course only speculate why they are so vociferous in their criticism of it.
Just like Wednesday (as described in One Step at a Time...), I twisted and turned, and checked out my dancer's legs in the mirror the few moments I had the opportunity. I really started getting into it, smiling, hips wiggling, head-whipping in the turns. Fun, fun, fun, I tell you! I kept my eyes locked with my partner's, and 98% of my head in the lesson. The other 2% was thinking about the pounding rain on the studio's roof. It caused me to fail to hear one of the teacher's calls as we danced, but you know... overall I would give myself a B+.
Yesterday, at a house-warming party, I spent a long time talking to some of my friends in the Humboldt Permaculture Guild about various aspects of garden design, and the subject of peach trees on the coast came up. My friend Levon was talking about a consultation he’d done for a local resident’s orchard, and they had asked what to do about the problem of peach leaf curl. He said he told them the various ways to try to manage it, but the real answer was: “Cut down your peach trees and plant more plums.” Plums do great along the coast here, he pointed out, with little management or intervention, as do pears and apples. Why fight a constant (and probably losing) battle to keep your poor Frost peaches alive when there are plenty of fruit trees that thrive in this environment without our help?
Tomorrow, I will blog about the first steps we’ve taken and reveal the game plan for me to start correction the root problems instead of just treating symptoms. For now, thanks for reading. I hope that you will find some of the information I post during this journey useful and that you too will be inspired to reach a healthier lifestyle. Thanks and God bless!
I’m in clearing in the middle of a rolling thick forest. It’s dark. A fairly large community of people started living here ever since a Black Magician put a spell over the land. We live in trailers and eat whatever we can scavenge. There is a political science club that holds classes on political theory — I am in this club — and we are currently studying for a national test that will award a monetary scholarship to those who score in the top 5 percent. I couldn’t care less, but I’m still kept up at night trying to solve annoying practice test questions. The teachers of this preparatory class are my former high school professors — I know they don’t like me very much.
I don't think it is in my head. I am a very skeptical person.
There was silence on the line.
We make no apologies for attempting to persuasively make the case for Christianity. But in the end, only God can change the human heart.
“To find out what higher dimensions might look like, all we have to do is study the relationship between our 3-D world and the 2-D comics. A 4-D creature could look “down” on us through our walls, our clothes, even our skeletons. Our world would be a Cubist X-ray, and perhaps even our thoughts might be laid bare to their gaze.
Named and shamed
italian cream soda, no breve
Overall I think this is a great thermometer. I have been using the RediScan No Touch Thermometer as my primary thermometer, and will continue using it for my family! You can find the RediScan No Touch Thermometer and other medical needs by visiting Medical Support Products at http://www.mspinc.com/
Alerted by his screams of agony, passers by called the fire brigade, but any rescue attempt was deemed far too dangerous until at least after the end of the Tony Blackburn Breakfast show. Tragically, however, by then it was too late, Von Rectangle – unable to take any more, had torn his own head off rather than listen to any more Tony Blackburn.
Picture 4: sunflower with a small visitor
I know today is very hard for you for a number of difficult reasons, whether it be infertility, baby loss, estrangement from your mothers...the list could go on. I have been there for all of them and while today is about happiness and joy for me - that is what I am choosing to focus on - it is still kind of hard for me when I think about my mother today. Apparently she is doing so much better and loving life (according to my SIL) and I am sorry if I don't just buy that and feel extremely jaded about it all...Anyways, not going there today.
I've now thinned it down to beer and stickers. Obviously the beer is pertinent here and what got me on to this is a combination of needing a board to catalogue my collection of beers, thus saving me literally hours sitting in the larder rummaging through crates, trying to decide what to drink and what to keep.
-Questions and answers with mortgage specialists
That must have sucked.
The Bride of Christ Church is the manifestation of Jesus in his disciples and in the world. Just as Mary became pregnant by the Holy Spirit to birth Jesus, so the Bride Church is impregnated by the Bridegroom to birth His Kingdom into the world. The fruit of our labour literally becomes Jesus in the world.
Independence, that crime against imperialism, can be successfully defeated!
If you are looking for REAL PERFUME FOR REAL WOMEN then Harvey Prince would be the right place for you to visit.
Joshie has only been around for a little while, and at first he started off all shy and quiet. Eden fixed that though. Now he’s a member of our little clan and we love him. Josh is probably the sweetest and nicest person I’ve ever met. I love him too death, and he better keep in touch forever. If he doesn’t Eden and I will hunt him down. For anyone that knows us, you know we can and we will.
We do so many different jobs and wear so many different ‘hats’, social worker, teacher, mother, nurse, psychologist, counsellor blah blah blah…. But why do we keep saying yes?
The place where I reside?
This is absolutely terrific - a SPACE series for young girls from the creator of the spy series Zac Power Test Drive. Star Girl is a brand new tween fantasy adventure series of books perfectly crafted for young readers - especially girls, who are just starting to handle chapter books ... and of course who want space adventures.
Dialogue: 6,0:00:25.25,0:00:32.22,Default,,0000,0000,0000,,Surely there must be people who aren’t interested in studying, sports, or romance.
“Darien?” Addison’s voice was low as she looked up at him, her raccoon eyes now visible as they walked back into the house.
This is my Herb Shelf in my Potions Cabinet for our Potions class. There are a lot of items pulled right out of the yard and placed in jars, leaves, un-ripened fruit (it's early spring here), grass, flowers, etc. One jar is labeled "Floobber Worm Parts" and I took hot glue and squeezed it into a large jar of cold water once a "worm" was created I took it out and did it over and over again. I have tissue paper cut into scales of dragons. Be creative! The other ingredients I purchased at a garage sale ... here is how the bargaining went.
Um...it takes a lot to make at a loss for words but I truly am.
While the cute tram, a combination of orange coloured and clear glass, cream coloured metal and shiny wood (see photo), rattled and snaked its way through the town-centre, I was told it dated from 1928.
Stupid sickness.
UPDATE - and a few more since then:An initial 5.8-magnitude quake sent the airport building swaying from side to side and shoppers scurried from a supermarket as products fell from shelves. It was followed by a series of aftershocks, including a magnitude 6 and two more magnitude 5 or above.
One outcome may be a polymorphism of brightly colored phenotypes, due to selection shifting to scarcer and more novel hues whenever a color variant becomes too common (Endler, 1980; Frost, 2006; Hughes et al., 1999; Hughes et al., 2005; Olendorf et al., 2006). This frequency dependence has been shown in humans. Thelen (1983) presented male participants with slides showing attractive brunettes and blondes and asked them to choose, for each series, the woman they would most like to marry. One series had equal numbers of brunettes and blondes, a second 1 brunette for every 5 blondes, and a third 1 brunette for every 11 blondes. Result: the rarer the brunettes were in a series, the likelier any one of them would be chosen.
It has boosted its profile in Ireland and recently renewed its sponsorship of the Gaelic Athletic Association, which promotes Irish traditional sports, in a five-year deal.
I finished this last evening but didn't get a chance to post it until tonight.
How many stones did Dave get? 5 smooth stones.
Anyhows, I'm putting plans to move to the seaside on the back-burner for now for reasons of (im)practicality, but instead looking at cutting down the way money trickles through my fingers so that we can go on far more seaside adventures/travel/blah blah blah. Top idea so far though is to make more money... so I've been faffing about on ebay and typing in random objects that I happen to own and happily finding out people are paying ££ for the same things. A gas heater for VW vans being one of them - a very random car boot treasure from eons ago, purely because it was turquoise and silver, for instance. So later on today, with the glorious sun still out (we hope) photos will be taken and Some Proper Ebaying will get done.
By the way, I’m not averse to using canned or frozen corn in my recipes when I have to. It’s just that when the real thing is available, why not reach for the stars?
I know a lot of people aren’t as excited for the release of the books anymore and feel the series went wrong somewhere after book 7, but I’m not one of them. I’m glad the series has a definite end point. I’m nervous about Eric and Sookie’s relationship, and that’s what makes reading it exciting! I don’t think that it will be the queen of Oklahoma or a fairy skirmish that will ultimately keep the two apart, and whether or not they “end” up together will ultimate be up to Sookie. That’s as close to a prediction as I’m willing to make.
Research and observations show that managerial psychopaths possess many self-serving and/or maladaptive emotions, such as: Arrogance, grandiosity, pleasure, anger, rage, hostility, contempt, overweening, envy, jealousy, greed, suspiciousness, impatience, and irritability. Because of their superficial charm, people often misperceive their impulsivity and unscrupulousness as being courageous and determined, and mistake their self-inflation and self-admiration as signs of self confidence.
The Armed Forces Supreme Council, the military’s highest body, depicted itself as the champion of reform in its latest statement. Trying to win the trust of an angry and skeptical population, the army promised to make sure Mubarak lifts hated emergency laws immediately once protests end. Mubarak and Suleiman had only given a vague timetable for ending the law — when security permits.
I started with linen cardstock, it's from a Bazzil and it came from open stock and I don't know the color, should pay more attention before I cut them up......and then added the "Lavender Rosebuds" paper by Paper Pizzaz. Next is some white cardstock that I distressed with Ranger's Bundled Sage Ink and some lavender colored scrap paper, name and brand unknown, that I used a Recollection's border punch on both sides. I then took a strip of white cardstock and worked in the background colors with a sponge (Ranger's Distress Inks...Tumbled glass, Wild Honey, and more Bundled Sage) and then used some assorted grass stamps, again with the Distress Inks to get that faded look in Wild Honey, Tea Dye, and Bundled Sage. Time for the focus stamp, Solidago Sprig by Rubber Stampede. I used some Liquid Applique and made tiny dots over the dots on the flower to give it the 3D effect and colored them with Copid markers in different shades of Violet. Then matted it on a rich brown cardstock, adhered it with Dimensional tape, added some ribbon, a bow and some pearls from Studio G. Viola, a nice note card...Ooops forgot about the butterfly.....have to have a butterfly in there. I took a Medium Butterfly punch from Fiskars and used it on some scrap black cardstock, folded it in half, took a smaller Butterfly stamp from Inkadinkado, colored in the wings and cut them apart and glued them to the black, positioned it on the card and added a little antennae with a black Fine Sharpie. Sorry for boring you, but from other Blogs I think you have to get the credits in there! Will try to simplify it in the future.
TR Reid, who wrote the book on competitive medical care costs - The Healing of America: A Global Quest for Better, Cheaper, and Fairer Health Care – has a new program on PBS in which he investigates what different communities across our country are doing to control medical care delivery system costs while providing quality care and covering everyone, regardless of insurance coverage.
FellowMalaysian: To atone for the unpardonable injustice and flagrant disregard of law and order, the police must apologise to last Saturday's innocent victims such as the bystanders who were hit be the police car, the lawyers and journalists and cameramen covering the scenes.
They just want you to listen,
I can tell you from my experience
Sonia Kashuk: Bent Eyeliner Brush
To make way.
It’s reported that Jackson introduced a 10 minute clip of his upcoming film (to be released on the 14th December here in the UK) via a prerecorded message: eager fans were treated to a scene between Bilbo and Gollum, plenty of Gandalf, and some mysterious unfinished green screen action. It’s not the action that’s made headlines, it’s the tech behind it.
Then, at that time I was going to write this on my blog… but how should I write it?
While at a feast at a Pharisee’s home, Jesus was being carefully watched. I don’t get the idea that these were protective eyes. The crowd here is watching every move Jesus makes, waiting for him to slip up so they can condemn him and discredit him. This is a group who is always jostling for position. They want to use their self-righteousness and self-proclaimed holiness to show everybody that they are closest to God.
Evil Joy’s Applied Mathematics Bachelors Degree was not meant for this type of use.
We all eventually become new memory keepers.
It’s nice to have a reminder that although at times breathing is all you can do – sometimes that’s enough for now.
Here we go again, time of the holiday season is knocking on your door. This is part six of the PPC seasonal venture. All previous volumes are still available and quite enjoyable. So, if you want them, you can get them. "A Christmas Blog Gift For You" (2006), "Another Christmas Blog Gift For You - Born To Greet" (2007), "Dreamland With The Pop Snowflakes" (2008) or "Santa Claus & The Powerpop Criminals (2009), The Magnificent Seven (2010). Thanks for visiting the PPC Blog, and have a cool yule!...Enjoy the spirit of Christmas... and don't forget to comment about this "Wonderful Christmastime"..
However, the family still did not get to see father for most of the week. He continued to work very hard, hoping to be promoted to the position of manager. In fact, to make himself a worthily candidate for the promotion, he enrolled for another course in the open university.
One week ago, my company had a sizeable layoff. The news was announced (per Federal law) that morning, and those of us on the later shifts were left waiting, to see if we would still have jobs or not.
We waddled (or at least, I did) down to the shops, Iris in the pram and Sazz’s daughter Harriet on her back in an ergo. We couldn’t find the book I had been telling Sazz about in our favourite book store. Sazz suggested we go to the library and give the kids a run around in there. I felt heavy and fat and pregnant and didn’t want to walk that far. Sazz wanted Harri to stretch her legs so we ended up going to the library and girls had a play in the children’s section, while we sat down, after not being able to find the book we were after.
The novel's real strength, however, was Gill James's interesting take on the future. I can't place my finger on what felt new, but I enjoyed it, and I wish we could have spent more time exploring instead of developing emotionally. The book got better as it went on, and I'd certainly pick up book two in the series.
Rotisserie Chicken – Already Cooked (Either Hot or Refrigerated)
The start of a very improvisational and wonky lap quilt. The grey is a road, the blocks vineyards and farm paddocks. I can't wait to work on it again tomorrow, although I expect a fair amount of time will be spent unpicking!
In a behind the scenes move yesterday the U.S. Senate cleared the way for the U.S. to increase its borrowing authority by another $500 billion to $15.19 trillion. The move was designed to support the current level of federal government borrowing through late January or early February.
On the inside of my card I added three real buttons in each corner...sew far sew good...I then messed up....:(. The directions said use the sentiment "Sew" Glad We Are Friends!" which of course I generated with my computer and messed up......this old brain was sure it said "Sew" glad we're friends...sigh....I was doing so well. I'm beginning to think that I am going to unintentionally mess up on each month. Apparently I am not a good instruction reader. To finish up the challenge we were supposed to share who would be receiving our card if we chose. I have been thinking long and hard about this. I wanted to send it to all my Calendar girl friends as well as all my SCS stamping friends, my stamping Wednesday night friends and all the other people I am blessed to call friends and I ♥, but of course that would mean tons of this card..."sew" after much deliberation I have decided to send it to my friend Lynn. Lynn and I met 2 weeks before her wedding at a stamp class several years ago. We were the only two in the class and hit it off right away. We have done many things together and have enjoyed each others company as well as enabled each other in many ways on our girls days out...lol...Lynn still stamps but has become passionate about quilting. She has invited me to a few quilting classes which I have attended with her and I have completed one (should be 3) quilt front. She tapped into my "old" love of sewing and has re-introduced me to my sewing machine. I still don't sew as much as I stamp (heavens there just isn't enough time...that darn work keeps getting in my way), but I have some sewing projects I'm just itching to get my hands on..."Sew" not only is Lynn a treasured friend but she is my "sewing" buddy as well...and I felt that this card really summed up our friendship....
The prostitute and the stripper who participated in the Ottawa “Human Library” recently published an article in which they take exception to a reporter’s coverage of the program:
The only thing left to do is decide when to break out the fall decor. I’m thinking mid-September or perhaps after Labor Day if I’m feeling ambitious.
all while helping take things off the shelves.
Next on the list is Bell's Expedition Stout, their incarnation of a Russian Imperial Stout. Black as night and as viscous as 10w30, this roasty, chocolaty libation coats the palate with lingering maltiness and a balancing bitter. Great fresh or aged.
Mi Roo receives another email from the blackmailer. They know Mi Roo is Sofia and knows the identities of all the men she’s met with for the column. They want Mi Roo to admit that she’s Sofia and if Mi Roo doesn’t come out with the truth, they’ll reveal it on the internet.
Around 18 months old, we started seeing his eyes starting to migrate inward. It took a long time to get him into the ONE pediatric opthamologist in Maine (where we had moved). We started patching (with dialating drops since he wouldn't keep the patch on) and he got his first pair of glasses! Those glasses had way more than 9 lives! Those poor things had to be repaired SO many times and the frames replaced from being mutilated by a 1 year old!
We got a bus into Kingston again. We can walk to a train station in under 10 minutes, however, my knees are really really painful (so much so that if I were at home there would be an appointment made with my hot physio and maybe even my Dr) so if I can avoid stairs and additional walking I'm going to take that option at the moment.
There’s an emptiness inside her
This intuitive self-discipline is of great use in the studio, but like any discipline requires vigilance to maintain. Balancing doubt must be a certain degree of faith in the absurd activity of painting itself.
She walks into her house, she can smell the pure smell of fresh cat piss. Oh, isn’t ammonia the freshest smell. These stupid ass cats. I wish they could clean up after themselves. Fuck it.
When Dawn arrived at 4:30, my surges were 5-7 minutes apart and I was amazed at how good I was feeling (so far). Throughout the early morning I was making laps around the house, up and down the stairs, doing lunges and squats, trying to move things along. Dawn had taught us in class that one contraction on the toilet was worth three normal ones. What?!?! Buy 1 get 2 free?!?! I’m always up for a bargain! Hello porcelain throne! My sister, Jenna, stopped by on her way to work around 8:30 am to drop off an essential oil she figured I could use, and I was still “quite chipper”.
Meaning: This style of ribbon is a symbol for autism.
In a recent interview with RT, Assange said that he chose RT because he found the channel’s penetration higher than Al Jazeera’s. “We’ve seen RT’s reportage on the attacks on WikiLeaks for a number of years, and that reportage has generally been quite supportive,” he said. “When we were looking what international broadcaster we wished to partner with as opposed to national broadcasters, we looked to see what was the penetration into the United States. And RT had higher penetration in the United States than Al Jazeera.”
Brulee stopped dead in her tracks, face going from surprise to anger as she flipped to the side to face Lakosha. “Send me away?” she accused. “I was promised that I could stay here, close to my sister, until she has awakened! And now you ask me to leave here, to leave her alone?”
The dark around him grows more so, swirling in like a velvet caress. Its chill touch makes his ebon skin break out in a sweat. He wills his body to move, to pull itself up, to push away from his seat on the ground. It doesn’t listen. With a shock, Mesdan realizes that he’s completely paralyzed.
The critique of the political economy of sex work
I'm sure there's a pill for that, or a six week course to self love or some other crap (actually, I am SURE there is no cure, that I will die with this affliction, but if I said that it would make me sound crazy and self loathing, which I am sure I am NOT.)
1 existence
1 neither
Someone in front of me lets out a baleful “Uh, oh!” and the pandemonium begins. It is hard to enjoy the hustle and bustle of a cancelled flight. News of it alone sparks Armageddon. Like wildly rearing horses the terminal becomes strewn with ear-pricked, disgruntled inhabitants stampeding in mayhem over their unconventional manners. Emotionally heightened conversations detonate my travel bubble, and I am quickly dispersed into the dispiriting scene. The realm of pure noise is hardly a soft landing as I careen into the bedlam of luggage-toting figures. Stumbling my way further and further into the sodden gloom, I search for a spot to stretch my legs for I too am an emotional casualty. Not finding an empty seat, I crouch on my baggage and resign myself to my fate.
blown
If you didn't win and would like to purchase any of the books from the giveaway, just head on over to Real Deal Books on eBay (did I mention all of her books have FREE SHIPPING?). Sherry was SO sweet to donate the books for the giveaway, I have to shout out a huge THANK YOU and YOU ROCK!! to her! :)
Naturally, my response:
1 c. butter, melted
In training the mind through meditation and contemplative disciplines, a helpful analogy is to regard the mind-brain-body as a remarkable musical instrument that is capable of generating the sweetest of music, yet all too often is poorly maintained, left untuned and plagued with chaotic and noisy sounds. If we sincerely wish to learn to play beautiful music, we must study with a master who knows the instrument inside and out. Both teachers and students alike need to know how to quiet their stress, maintain emotional awareness and receptiveness for learning. In order to develop a calm, clear, joyful, and loving mind, we need the guidance of someone who thoroughly understands what the mind is, how the mind works and how it can be transformed … someone whose own heart-mind is truly open to the full depths of being and embraces the full dimension of all creation.
Today I write about the fetish character of money. The fetish character of money is strangely neglected in theories that use fetishism as a basis for their theories of social domination. This is odd because: (a) Marx’s theory of value is a monetary theory of value. (b) He spends an awful lot of time in the value form section showing that “The simple form of commodity is the secret of the money-form. You may sprinkle sand on this!” This would then (a) seem to point to conceiving of the fetish character of money as a further development of the fetish character of commodities and (b) point to using money and the fetish character of money as basis from which to derive theories of social domination. To me this strategy seems more fruitful than simply using the properties of the commodity and extending them to different phenomena by way of analogy. In the former we could get a systematic notion of mediation, in the later we lack any notion of mediation, derivation or indeed interaction.
JOHANNESBURG Nov 27 (Reuters) - South Africa's Julius Malema, the firebrand leader of the ANC's Youth League, has admitted his political career is over after his suspension from the ruling party for breaking its internal rules, the Sunday Times newspaper reported.
Camera Girl
I would have to say Pathfinder was the last "big" thing (and it is still going strong). It pushed itself from a side project (trying to maintain their adventure/module business) into a leader within the rpg scene. Some of the best designers now put out Pathfinder material and it is a "go-to" commodity for new designers.
you arrived will itself arrive.
Testimony regarding the definition of Natural Born Citizen is given citing Minor vs Happersett opinion from a Supreme Court written opinion from 1875. The attorney points out the difference between “citizen” and “Natural Born Citizen” using charts and copies of the Minor vs Happersett opinion.
On January 31, the prequel novella to the Dark Days series will be released as an e-book. This novella originally appeared in the Unbound anthology and for the first time, will be available as it's own e-book for downloading.
Synopsis (from Indiebound): Ever since her police officer father was killed a few months ago, Grace Abernathy hasn't wanted to do much of anything. She's pulled away from her friends, her grades are plummeting . . . it's a problem. The last thing Grace wants is to be dragged into her older sister Regan's plan to train a shelter dog as a service dog. But Grace has no idea how involved she'll get - especially when a mangy mutt named Rex starts talking to her. Has Grace gone off the deep end? Or might this dog be something really special - an angel? A spirit? Either way, he is exactly the therapy that Grace needs.
“We liked the same music. We liked poetry. We liked sleeping together. Beyond that? Nothing more.”
Shuttered Room
In the inner circle of sibling relationships, what makes it more hurtful when they do something that you don't like is that it is way more than just a stranger calling you a name or doing something to hurt you:
The story of that first sale is posted here. That page desperately needs updating – maybe I’ll get to it before you read this, but meanwhile here is more current information.
Oh, and I have rivets, too.
Quality of Composition and Quality of the Print
My prototype...
Blessings to you and yours,
It all depends what I'm doing, really. If I'm working freelance for a client, I'll be focused on their brief to the exclusion of all other projects, however compelling they may be. When I'm working on a novel, I like to immerse myself in that world and read the dialogue aloud, in character. It helps that I write in the attic! Sometimes I temp, so any time before and afterwards has an added tension and focus. Strangely, I often get more writing done then.
Do I love it when he asks me to process my day with him? Absolutely.
Because I LOVE historical fiction. And gossip. And secrets. And mysteries. I can't wait!
A Forest City spokesman told the Times--which covered the lawsuit, bizarrely, in the midst of an article about a Nets promotional event at Borough Hall--that 19 of the 36 "trainees found jobs in property management, retail or construction related positions." Unmentioned was whether any were high-paying union jobs; Caldwell has said only a few have such jobs.
Anyway, what you gonna do about it?"
The time to enter this giveaway ends on April 19, 2010 at midnight.
No back links please, if the item was on your blog before September 28th then it will be removed. Thanks for your understanding on this matter.
Look.
A little later, Simone returned with my spaghetti pomodoro. It was a simple meal but was cooked to perfection. The wholesome starch of the pasta and the tangy sauce of tomatoes with zesty herbs was savory and delicious. I dipped the bread into a plate of olive oil and red wine vinegar and tasted the mellow, warm oil combined with the sharp acidity of vinegar soaked into crusty bread. The combination of flavors were both comforting and invigorating. Drinking the wine was like consuming a part of Italy itself. It was pungent, fruity, and passionate.
their first initial onto their backpacks.
I’ve never read a book like Emotional Equations. Clearly, Chip Conley is more than a speaker. He’s a reader, and he’s an open book, as it were, about what he read and analyzed to come up with the ideas he shares here, starting with Abraham Maslow. I was impressed, again and again, with the intellectual leaps Conley made. This book won’t just go onto a shelf, out of reach. Rather, it’ll be one I need close by, to refer to again and again. ◊
And challenge me.
skim broth when done and strain through sieve
Bend down.
Governor's Road, looking east from east of Creighton, due to be widened by another lane of traffic...
3. Favorite breakfast food:
That book was written by the late Loren Pope, who was the education editor of the New York Times for many years. Pope believed that the benefits of attending the elite "name-brand" colleges were greatly overrated by parents and school counselors, and that there were many lesser-known schools that did a better job of developing a lifelong love of learning and providing the foundation for a successful and fulfilling life beyond college.
Happy New Year Everyone!!!
Along the front fence in our yard, we have cactus, yuccas, and pampass grass growing. The cactus was grown by my husband's grandmother, then his mother. My sweet mother-in-law shared with me as we were establishing our yard and the prickly pear makes a great border. The animals do not want to pass through the "live" fence.
abv: 6.3% ibu’s: 75
Utilizing my apt detective skills, I questioned my roommates about the vandalized door. They were unhelpful in my investigation, and were more concerned about my lack of pants. I came to the realization that whoever disgraced my bathroom would never be caught, but came up with a plan to guarantee this did not happen again.
The chords they rang out like springs
Bethenny, who has had a little to much to drink at the cash bar, runs up to Jill and starts going OFF about all of the bullshittery occurring at this party. Jill can't get a word in edgewise, but she tells the camera that she is PISSED. Not only about the rudeness that is the cash bar, but the fact that Kelly is over an hour late to her own party. "It's not polite to show up late to your own party, but maybe that's the chic world she lives in," she says. Oh, BURN!
…To Be Continued…
The Optoma HD70 is a wonderful addition to any home. It’s small, portable and, best of all, lightweight. It’s not excessively branded with giant banners or stickers and can fit in any drawer or under any bed and be ready for action whenever you desire top of the line movie quality for your Friday night date, Sunday afternoon football game, or just an average weekday in bed. When it comes down to high performance and sleek design, the Optoma HD70 is the projector for you.
The truth of the matter is that the reason Ms. Perfect hasn't appeared has nothing to do with your luck, good or bad, but everything to do with you and the fact that you are busy looking for a person that doesn't exist! You can't date with your eyes closed and some impossible dream in your head. You'll get so caught up in this whole exercise of dating that you forget to look for the qualities you seek! You haven't met the person of your dreams because you aren't looking for the things that will make them close enough to perfect for you.
I'd heard about the juxtaposition of Venus, Jupiter, and the moon a couple of weeks ago, I think. I've been noticing the crescent moon and the various orientation of the two bright planets in the clear (low humidity) night skies over the last few days.
I threw all the ingredients into the clay pot carelessly, but I think it would be better to braise the onion, carrot, celery mixture first, and then add the pieces of rabbit and garlic to the clay pot.
So, Happy National Peanut Butter Day!! I hope you all celebrate accordingly, I leave you with a simply delightful peanut butter s’more recipe to give try, and now I will be off on previously announced food-cation! Enjoy!!
Since most of the cast members were couples I tried to arrange things so we could set up housekeeping of sorts whenever I had the opportunity to do so. We would be working a number of towns around the Boston area and also have several days off. Staying near the city made sense.
Go, just go
Until today I am still unable to master the shapes they are found in the shops, I am sure this recipe I am sharing with you is just as delicious.
Here's a sample, laisse 150. First the original, then in modern French, then in Sayers' English (she attempts to emulate the syllabication and assonance of the original):
Laugh as much as you breathe and love as long as you live- Of course laughter is the best medicine of all !
So far, DBKL says that it will try to only block roads leading to the historical site, and not lock down the whole city like it did last year.
“I have come across instances where laptops were given to the elderly, many of whom are illiterate and the majority of whom have no understanding at all of modern technology.
I've been browsing Flood® Wood Care's website and it is really fun to see the image gallery. Their are so many fun project to look at with beautiful colors, and fun inspiration, I wish I could pick them all. I'm sure many of you are planning diy summer projects as well. If you have any wood projects coming up, I would definitely check out Flood® Wood Care for some ideas on how to treat, maintain, and create your outdoor space. In fact, I would just go there either way and look at all of the neat ideas just because they are amazing to look at and plan for. It's just an awesome company with quality products and hey!, they are the wood care specialist after all. I'll have to keep you all updated on my little stair case and the tender loving care it most definitely needs.
Hel learns that the general who raised him is being held as a prisoner of war by the Russians and faces an ignominious show-trial for war crimes, and decides that the only way he can show his gratitude for the man's raising him in Shanghai is to kill him and help him avoid the embarrassment of the trial. He achieves this through his skills at the art of "Naked/Kill", a martial discipline that trains in the use of ordinary items as instruments of death. Hel is then tortured by the Americans and held in solitary confinement without trial, Hel being a citizen of no country. In prison, his physical and mental discipline, along with studying the Basque language from some old books abandoned by a missionary, help him to retain his sanity, although, due to the torture and drugs used in his interrogation, he is no longer able to fully escape mentally and reach his state of peaceful ecstasy. He even develops, in his solitude, a "proximity sense" through which he is aware of any being drawing near (along with its amicable or hostile intentions), and which also allows him to find his way in complete darkness.
Mix together rice flour, gram flour, urad dal flour, Ajwain and Seasmae seeds, salt, chilli powder and Butter.
Ja the debater seems like a confusing part of an artistic process, especially if one doesn’t know anything about debate. Before I got into creative writing, I had no formal training except for standard English classes. I only joined the literary club in grade school once, but we didn’t really do anything there. I never joined other writing clubs. I never joined contests. I never tried to get published. I never even showed my work to anyone. I always knew I loved writing, but I never planned on becoming a writer. Only in my third year in college did I realize that I was brave enough to face the “humiliation” of choosing to “demote” myself from the practical and logical career path that was available after B.S. Management, to the walang-pera-diyan (there’s-no-money-there) career path that was waiting for me after Creative Writing.
With respect to the environment, the theological principles are easily stated and uncontroversial. The biblical picture is that human beings, as image bearers of God, are placed as stewards over the created order. We bear a responsibility for how we treat and use it. We are part of the creation, as well as its crowning achievement. God intends for us to use and transform the natural world around us for good purposes.
worst: Spam, and I do not like the food either!
“My dear friend Dream,
- Pope John Paul II was the first Slavic pope ever, and the first non-Italian pope in 455 years! He became pope in 1978.
Petitioned thus, Parīkṣit gave Kali: places of gambling and contest, places of drinking, places of sexual promiscuity, and slaughterhouses.
The vociferous secularist minority may, at first hearing, sound like the majority of intelligent men and women, dominating the broadcasting channels and much of the printed media.
As an Energy Healing Practitioner, I work quite closely and often with Archangel Raphael, the Divine Healer of the Archangels. As a Psychic and as someone who empowers others to surrender and release anger and bitterness, I work a lot with Archangel Uriel, the Divine Psychic and Divine Psychologist of the Archangels.
Time for this mama to go crawl into bed and get some GOOd sleep! Night lovers!
Can you imagine that real queens actually strolled and rested within this, the Queens Garden? In season, this garden boasts blooms from hundreds of varieties of old-fashioned roses. Even without all of its rose blossoms, the garden with its tinkling fountain was stroll- and rest-worthy (at least for us among the unwashed masses).
17 Chase The Clouds Away
Starring: Ivan Marx and Peggy Marx
Come play, won't you? I love to see how these get interpreted!
Until that one night
Most of the artwork I've been doing these days has been for licensing or commissions, so I haven't had much to critique lately. I'm not used to not being able to show very much work publicly, at least before it is released. I'm starting to look at doing more and more work digitally, especially since my husband just gave me Painter for a surprise (yay!). I have already transitioned into digital for the licensing work I'm doing and it's really helped with the revisions and such. Now, to learn how to use Painter for my other children's illustrations! I feel optimistic about the new direction and really getting my feet wet working with an art director.
You all look quite schmick
that it was God I had
My sister was part of a duet with a friend of ours who was taking part in a recital. they were both very excited and VERY nervous but they had a blast the whole time. The video came out pretty good. My brothers camera is awesome!!
“It may be that in his rogues the writer gratifies instincts deep-rooted in him, which the manners and customs of a civilised world have forced back to the mysterious recesses of the subconscious. In giving to the character of his invention flesh and bones he is giving life to that part of himself which finds no other means of expression. His satisfaction is a sense of liberation. The writer is more concerned to know than to judge.”
“There are persons who, when they cease to shock us, cease to interest us.”
I didn’t take off too fast, but it took a lot of will power to hold my pace in that heat. I had decided to carry my own drink so at the water stop I just dumped it over my head and kept running. My knee didn’t hurt at all, but I knew from the last couple of weeks that if I stopped and walked, it was going to stiffen up so I kept on running. I had started out pretty far back in the pack, but steadily passed overheated runners one by one. My final finishing time was 35:41, almost a full minute per mile faster than last year! This moved me up from 6th place last year to 2nd (once again missing first by a frustratingly small margin.)
“War Stories”
the glitter glue is from my stash and same for the mat I used for my wirtting
After watching the trailers, I found another fun made trailer, actually a parody, for the upcoming remake of Titanic 3D. Check it out…
Arben Dzaferi: The fundamentalist policy, which is identified with the Islam, cannot be successful anywhere, especially in counties, which follow democratic standards and values. These trends are a pale copy of the communism in the recent history of Europe.
Finally, there is "Thalaba the Destroyer", a 26- minute panegyric of the epic Celtic legends, a tour-de-force of orchestral brilliance and sensational power. This is a shamefully neglected opus that should definitely be resurrected from the oblivion in which it lies. However, it will suffice to say that this performance should prove to be well nigh unsurpassable on all counts, recording and aesthetically wise.
I do want to say that it’s important that the May 1st Coalition is emphasizing what’s going on in the Supreme Court right now. It appears as if sanctioning racial profiling and sanctioning the witch hunt against immigrants is going to become the law of the land. And so, we definitely want to send a message of solidarity to the people of Arizona today. We understand that one of the key organizers in Tucson, for example, in Arizona, Isabel Garcia, received a threatening email. And if I received a threatening email the day before May Day, it wouldn’t be such a big thing. But with Isabel receiving such an email in Arizona, it’s very serious. And so, we want to make sure that we’re clear that we want to take a stand against what’s going on in Arizona today in—at Union Square.
Doctors back denial of treatment for smokers and the obese, says the Guardian, going on to say that “Survey finds 54% of doctors think the NHS should have the right to withhold non-emergency treatment.”
I always enjoy celebrating St. Patrick's Day. Today, I will be cooking corn beef and cabbage with some new potatoes. A few years ago, I got to see a documentary on St. Patrick. It was so helpful to me in understanding this man of God. I came away from that experience greatly admiring him. Here are a few facts about him for you to know.
The sanctions, which appear to have taken the junta by surprise, are beginning to bite. Already throughout Bamako there are long lines at banks for cash and at service stations for fuel. Some Western diplomats here predict that the junta will not be able to withstand the embargo for even three weeks.
One more thing to take it a step further if you want. Check the links of a blog with a theme you like. You will likely find some more blogs about the same subject.
Looking up at him, I smiled.
the image oval is then another oval attached with foam pads to the middle.so you have the main oval.2 half ovals and your image oval in the centre of the card so the main weight is in the centre.the weight will then rest on your raised sentiment.
And now to the lovely Belorussian leader, Alexander Lukashenko. Considering the fact that Lukashenko himself is certainly no boyscout – a true Soviet-style leader in every sense of the term – it comes as no surprise that he would "pat Raulita on the back following his rubber-stamp “election.”
The reasons for the strong vote for the FN, are also likely to be the same reasons for the poor showing on the day of Melonchon. Although, the media have described Melonchon as the candidate of the Far Left, in fact, his programme has largely been a rehash of traditional Stalinist positions. Those Stalinist positions, which were summed up in the various "National Roads To Socialism", lean heavily on discredited, statist, reformist solutions, mixed in with a strong dose of Nationalism. Indeed, as Trotsky said, the accurate description of Stalinism is "National Socialism". In many ways the programme of Melonchon, was barely distinguishable from that of Le Pen.
Can you believe it? I was so annoyed that they hadn’t put Tension on the album, and here it is. So we all know which version I’m getting now, don’t we?
But there is a problem in his parallel. His best parallel would be not evolution but dinosaurs - and creationists are not particularly known for denying dinosaurs. One famous creationist, unlike Dawkins in prison, was while free even known as Doctor Dino.
Out of Sight (Scott Frank)
Every time I think I find someone that I can talk to with some resemblance of a free thought, it always seems to turn out the same way. They just end up being people that act different, to fit in as not normal. In other words. A fucking lie. A persona they cast on themselves to try to somehow improve their image to the norm. It’s bullshit.
I have lost some of the weight I gained. I am back into some of the clothes that remind me of who I am. People are fond of calling me ‘bohemian’. Apparently it suits me. I have stopped fighting it for I recognise myself.
In addition to learning the ins and outs of marketing/pr, students will also
Here are some of the things I'm eying at Sephora:
KARL AND CB
The fountains are off, their pools empty, their sculptures petrified.
Callie wearing the same comob as me above: right pieces, backwards colors.
Naturally in these straitened times, things are a little unclear on the question of who’s paying for it. Israel coughed up some serious money for the original geological survey about oil and minerals. Being Israel, it will pay its fair share for this idea to become a reality. But Brussels, Berlin and Washington? Sadly dear reader, I know not. Yet.
More client-balling news as I have it.
* Say no
Tools: dotted scallop ribbon punch, Big Shot, sqaure lattice EF
But one by one, and with the help of our good friends in Tehran, every problem is solved. We find a mechanic who has worked for Volkswagen in Turkey. We find an importer of car parts. It will take three weeks to carry out the repair, including obtaining parts.
So, I make a dessert that The Renaissance Man loves. I am not kidding; he adores this dessert, and he doesn’t use the word “adore”. Unfortunately for you, I have made it twice in the last few weeks, and on neither occasion did I think to take process pictures. I blame it on global warming. Everything is because of global warming, right?
More work needed to make it a bit better. There was a interim period when it looked even better than this but alas, it didn't last long!
Ever-bearers are similar to June-bearers, but less sensitive to day length. This variety produces a large crop of berries in June and a smaller crop in the fall.
Beginning at 5:30 pm, The Venue Fine Art & Gifts at 114 S. Grant will host a special presentation by Jami Scholl, on creative aesthetic solutions to strengthen food security. From living edible sculptures, pocket gardens and the formal French potager, Jami will provide an overview of how to creating beauty using the elements of art and design to enhance food security and everyday health.
The fog of sickness slowly lifted on Saturday and I ate some solid food off the taco cart at our neighborhood block party because I just like to jump in with both feet. My friend Chris sent a message Saturday night about meeting up for a run on Sunday morning, and while I didn't think I could join for the entire 2-3 hours he was planning on doing, I did think I could manage a slow 6 miler.
Ghana's experimentation with Bus Rapid Transit is a misnomer; it's fully on course, with ads on radio on some stations in full swing. Wikipedia describes it thus:
In the work I like best, I'm finding an exciting combination of the very best of traditional and digital media - more vibrant color, looser, more inventive drawing, greater invention.
PS. If you want more, just google 'Malbork castle' and you'll find shitloads of great photos of this immense and awesome castle.
7-9 rue Montyon
P.S. for all you sleepy heads out there, pls click this video and listen to this song with your EYES CLOSED for maybe 10-15 seconds. Then open your eyes, I bet you will be wide eyed with your mouth open too. =) Happy viewing.
‘Why would you think that?’ I asked in surprise. ‘We’re both exhausted; I thought you were too tired.’
He’ll get bored,
Three ways, well. . . . . . . We’ve all been there – probably more than once. They are pretty random and an important part of lift – seriously! Actually, life is all about the three ways. Some of the three ways we quickly forget and some of the three ways we’ll remember and cherish for the rest of our lives – thinking about them with regret or with a big smile.
support the Keystone pipeline
twitch and gesture.
Another relatively poor year of reading - definitely need to get my head into the game ;) Most challenges were completed, though I still owe Rhinoa a read of Lolita. Picking favourite reads is always difficult for me, but I can say that my most enjoyed reads of 2010 include: A Fine and Private Place, The Book of Flying, Monsters of Men, Lonely Werewolf Girl, The Vintner's Luck, Clockwork Angel and Bernard Cornwell's The Warlord Chronicles.
This stained glass is a depiction of the crowning of King Edgar, the first king of all England (which is debatable). Edgar’s coronation was held at Bath Abbey. King Edgar’s story is an interesting one, but too long for this post and I expect that many sources tell it well. What I find so interesting about this stained glass window is that it seems highly political for a religious institution. Perhaps it stands out so much to me because of my “separation of church and state” American upbringing. I’d be curious how others view this lovely window.
I had seen someone carrying a proof copy of Maggot Moon, Sally Gardner's first book for Hot Key, and craved one. Ruth promised to send me one and gave me a promotional bag in consolation; she needed all her proofs for publishers rather than mavens. And there seems to be an auction building for it in Germany.
Place in a tall tumbler (clear, if possible, because the colors are attractive and appealing):
How is it that this hurts so much? How is it that when I’m with you, all my feelings surface and suddenly I’m alive? It was a lot easier without you, or at least it seemed so. I was alone and I didn’t have to talk. I didn’t have to feel. Pretending to be all right was easy. I buried all of this sadness. And now, it all feels so deep. My scars are hidden somewhere, beneath my skin. I’ve lost track of what was upsetting me from the first place. I’m deeply wounded, so I write about it and I get madder.
On another, totally unrelated, note...
In Dragon Tattoo, Lisbeth (and Blomkvist) resist the efforts by lawyers, guardians, psychiatrists, police, and other representatives of the state to slander Lisbeth Salander by calling her a prostitute. But CBS seems to have no such compunction about their as yet uncast “queanly” character.
These shrimp burgers definitely fall into that category. They're sort of reminiscent of crab cakes, but I think the shrimp flavor is stronger in these than the crab usually is in crab cakes. It probably goes without saying, but if you don't like shrimp, these burgers aren't for you. There isn't a ton of filler, so the shrimp shines. I've had issues in the past with crab cakes that were fragile and fell apart while cooking, but these held their shape perfectly. They develop a crispy, golden crust in the pan too, which made them feel decadent. The leftovers even reheated fairly well for lunch the next day - total bonus!
How many years have you been doing Script Frenzy?
58.Tommy Flake-Second Skin (Self-Released)
Harmonise.
Among the factors driving up the rate of preterm births in the US is the number of older women having babies; increased use of fertility drugs; obesity; and increased rates of medically unnecessary Caesarean deliveries, the study says.
so I wanted to share my menu with you,
Happy Easter, eggy humans! "Do you prefer boiled, scrambled or fried? That mas the option the Daleks gave me once."
I was streaky because I wanted it to look like wood grain. Then I added some streaks of E55 and last, some darker tones with E44. I was careful to keep all my streaks in the same direction, but also uneven (Look at my post on coloring wood for a stepped-out diagram of how to color wooden-looking things).
Guinsoo: I’m here.
I'm Cynthia Vespia and want to tell you about my mom. She was the light of my life, she was my best friend and my ideal reader. She encouraged me, but she also wasn't afraid to tell me when my writing sucked.
On April 24, an Israeli ministerial committee approved three settlement outposts – Bruchin and Rechelim in the northern part of the West Bank, and Sansana in the south. Although all settlement activities in the occupied West Bank and East Jerusalem are considered illegal by international law, Israeli law differentiates between sanctioned settlements and ‘illegal’ ones. This distinction has actually proved to be no more than a disingenuous attempt at conflating international law, which is applicable to occupied lands, and Israeli law, which is in no way relevant.
In pungent fruit and bright green wings, or else
I had planned to take a "Computer Fast" until after Easter, but this morning something happened that made me want the prayers and support of my Blog Friends. Aunt Trula had a stroke this morning, and is in the hospital. She is improving, but she is like a mom to Don and I and since we became her care givers the love and devotion has just grown and grown.
I realize that in essay #1 I attacked pie-eyed optimism and musical crutches, both of which are on display in School of Rock. An essential element of humanity is the ability to be (relatively) unapologetically hypocritical. Deal with it.
While I was meticulously balancing my bites of burger with sips of wine, I began thinking about simple pleasures. At that moment, my cheeseburger and Cabernet made me completely content, even happy. The mind-boggling day that I had began fading away, like a dream that you can't remember. I was amazed that the body and mind could be nourished by such simple things as burgers and wine. Aren’t simple pleasures the most wonderful gifts in the world? Here are some of my favorites:
in a square dance.
Price: Spendy, usual cafe prices
Spicy Lemongrass Tofu
Our after party episode went live over the weekend while I was in San Diego getting my Comic-Con. You can check out all the juicy jabber-jawing by checking out this linky-type thing:
Progressive Grocer
Some one left you negative feedback on your auction
PLEASE SUPPORT ALIRAN
After walking the quesy (and it wasn't just me by the way!) feelings off, we rode a few more rides and then headed over to the newest ride - the Maverick!
From the moment she was spotted at the X Factor auditions, it was known that she would stand out from the rest of the contestants in the show. Coming as far as the semi-finals, Misha B was booted out as she failed to get more votes for her to secure a place to next week’s Final.
The Lost Wife opens with the ending, where readers get to read about the reunion of a pair of long lost couple being separated from WWII as they meet by chance when attending the wedding of their grandchildren. The subsequent chapters then bring readers to pre-war Prague and introduce us to these star-crossed lovers and how they fall in love and the difficult situations they encountered while they tried to escape the horrors of the war.
So he pondered and thought, “what would Santa like most?”
Ok, so let me start with the fact that I am not typically bothered by the ghetto. I find myself so comfortable the majority of the time that it's a little uncomfortable for those who are with me. White girls should be uncomfortable in the ghetto, right? Well, yesterday I was! Perhaps that's because we weren't just in the ghetto - we were in the GH-EH-EH-EH-TO!
My family gatherings, are to put it mildly, a bit odd. While we dined on Thanksgiving turkey and all the fixings, my father casually made a reference to the time he lost his virginity at age 11 during a gang-bang in a secluded woodland setting with a 13 year-old girl who’d been impregnated by her step-father. Hardly appropriate dinner table conversation if you ask me, particularly with children at the table.
Here’s my first slide:
I proceeded to smush the dog pooh onto the windshield. A long reach for a short kid. I hoped anyone watching would appreciate the strenuousness of my efforts. ‘Round and round she goes, and where she stops nobody knows I said to myself reaching and dipping and smushing.
100,000-300,000: According to trafficking fanatics, the number of “trafficked child prostitutes” in the United States; this is the result of a misquote from the 2001 Estes and Weiner study which estimated 100,000-300,000 children, adolescents and young adults “at risk of sexual exploitation”, with sex trafficking as the rarest category of “exploitation” (see also “15,694“, “17,500” and “2511” below).
After eighteen years of school, I was still waiting for my future to begin.
So far everything has been wonderful except for the weather which is kind of grey (or grez as the case may be). The flight was smooth and easy and all my planning was for naught, since they gave every single one of us our own pillow and blanket. I did get a little bit of sleep, which was a good thing because as soon as I reached Buxtehude, I was taken to meet the mayor, and then to the incredibly fabulous Plaque With My Name On It ceremony. I am delighted to report that the plaque is right in front of a bakery, which given my fondness for baked goods, is extremely appropriate.
Our Lord Jesus is so loving
Victory Helios Saison
Dallas writes a beautifully story concerning the unique history of the Martin Company’s journey to Salt Lake City. This book addresses the female friendships that may have formed during this trying time. While this book is fiction, it is compelling in the humanity of the story. It focuses on four different women on the trail. One who converted to Mormonism and is excited about the promised land. Another who has married a missionary and is excited for her new life. Yet another, who along with her husband, is looking for a new adventure to confirm their new faith. And finally, a woman who does not believe but wants to save her marriage to her believer husband. Their stories overlap and turn into friendships of great strength. This is a well written book that is compels the reader to find a happy ending.
Characters
Two weeks ago I came across a blog post on a blog called, "What a Ride". This wonderful woman and her two children spent her 35th birthday doing random acts of kindness. In her post she describes their day. Awesome!
what do the geese
Everyone’s favorite chipmunks Alvin, Simon and Theodore, and their female companions, The Chipettes, have the time of their lives during a family vacation they’ll never forget in ALVIN AND THE CHIPMUNKS: CHIPWRECKED, debuting on Blu-ray, DVD and digital download on March 27 from Twentieth Century Fox Home Entertainment. The hilarious live-action comedy will also be available as an exciting “Island Adventure” edition on Blu-ray and 2-Disc DVD, filled with tons of fun for the whole family to enjoy just in time for Easter.
Congratulations to all workers.
The second way to win a prize is through "Voter's Choice." I'll put all the bows on the blog and will host a poll in the sidebar on Friday, Sept. 9. Invite your friends and relatives to vote for your bow! The winner of the Voter's Choice Award will receive a FREE e-book from Birdsong Bows and Patterns.
PS: Best of luck with that smaller-than-average penis!
New Belgium Ooh La La
The Anchor Bleu with the sea against its walls and half way up the road.
People keep asking if I feel different. Not necessarily, but....
Me: No, it doesn’t make sense because you said you are dating others in the meantime.
This is an incredible chilling and powerful story; not only because it is about such a horrific time, but also because Deogratias's personal story is so tragic. What would someone do, at that time, in that place?
I wish I'd left when I realized my relationship was over, not a year later.
‘‘(4) RELATIONSHIP TO OTHER LAWS REQUIRING THE DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION.—The submission of information under this subsection to the Federal Government shall not satisfy or affect any require ment under any other provision of law for a person or entity to provide information to the Federal Government.
Some people say the Horse isn’t a horse, but a dragon. It certainly isn’t a realistic representation of a horse, but it’s very much like horses on early Celtic coins: the Celts went in for abstract, flowing lines, and I’d agree with Granny Aching from Terry Pratchett’s wonderful Discworld book ‘A Hat Full of Sky’: "Taint what a horse looks like, it’s what a horse be."
Meantime Wheat is a decent enough example of the style, brewed not in Germany but in East London. It’s 5 percent ABV and uses wheat and pale malt, perle and northern brewer hops.
If you are not yet a member non-members are welcome to come along for single shows: £6.50 (concessions £5.50).
Eddie Smith comes out to Johnny Cash with Coaches Marc Fiore and Rick Drago. Eddie is clearly the hometown favorite as Mills has traveled in fromWisconsin(and actually took this fight on short notice).
7. The other two...well, it's a secret. I'll let you know.
“You know You’re Borderline When…”
Obviously, some rootsy countrified influences are discernible in your music. Are you Mekons fans?
I wasn’t brave enough to take any photos of the market although I took my camera. I found a blog that has great photos. Click here to see some photos of Mangga Dua purse market on lomography if you are interested.
To assemble this dish, place a layer of green beans on a plate, top with several meat balls, slather the thick peanut sauce on top, and top with chopped peanuts and green onions.
They cannot forever live in never-never land with rising prices and collapsing sales. There are many shoes that will drop, bringing back the Global Financial Crisis with a vengeance. Commodities crash, default by a Euro periphery nation, failure of a Euro bank, or the closure of Bank of America or Citi. All of these are likely events, less than one standard deviation from the mean; probably all of them will happen within the next year. No matter what the triggering event is, that commodities nuclear winter will happen.
Absolutely splendid night with my mate pete-not entirely sure what should be written here, but I’ve had a few pints and honestly life is quite good! Great to see friends grow up, although not too much thankfully-and its nice to have a chat with new people-with a lowest common denominator (that’s you pete). Right, should stop- fact from tonight-9 out of 10 people have an iPhone…..if you believe tonight’s statistics…
Now I’m sure I’m not alone out there when I say that I feel enormously guilty at receiving a gift on valentine’s day especially when it means it’s like pouring salt on an open wound for a single person so whilst all you singles out there are glaring at us and having a dig at how dumb valentine’s day is then please do know that we do feel bad about your circumstances which prevented you from receiving your own gift but please don’t hate us for being happy that we received ours.
The first week of the year the weather was quite good giving us a chance to start on some of the repairs to our terraces. Some are of course beyond repair and I'm going to have to get used to a new geography. Other places are still too unstable to consider repairing them before the danger of winter rains has passed.
In its August 31, 2011 news release, the DOL had invited the public to comment on the following “updates” to the FLSA that the DOL sought to enact:
“Can we see each other without the label?”
I will state categorically here that the change of cast was not an issue - the new people have slotted in beautifully and are every bit as entertaining and likeable as Annie, Mitchell and George were. It's the plot that I had trouble with. The War Child. The over-exposed Mark Gatiss 'Old One' character Mr Snow. Time travelling ghosts. In just eight short episodes it's stopped being about 'being human' and has turned into every other supernatural TV show/film from True Blood to Daybreak to Blade to Ultraviolet (the excellent TV series and the unrelated Mila Jovovich film). There were hints of this plot-line in the show's pilot back in 2008 where the original Mitchell (played by Guy Flanagan) was told by the original Herrick (Adrian Lester) that the vampire takeover is coming and to choose sides. That whole plot device was dropped for the revamped (sorry) pilot and series 1 and the show was all the better for it. Now, it seems, the vampire takeover plot has returned, for me, it's a big step backwards. I really don't want to see it drown in the sea of predictable supernatural cliches, especially when there is so much that can yet be done with the characters. Incidentally, the US Being Human is very good. It's taken a different path to the UK show but I love the ideas they are exploring there, such as their 'Annie' - Sally Malik - becoming addicted to possessing human bodies so that she can have a physical relationship. That's closer to what I think Being Human should be about than the UK show currently is. It was Being Human's originality that made it so wonderful and made me love it. I hope it gets back to that with series 5.
Psalm 34:11… “Come, ye children, hearken unto me: I will teach you the fear of the LORD” (KJV). Instruction is seen here… Believers need to be taught about “the fear of God.” Jesus taught about the Comforter… the Holy Spirit (John 14-16) and His teaching ability… “He shall teach you all things” (John 16:13, NIV)… i.e., things that you need to know at any given moment… God has answers…
Last Friday I spoke at an event at York Racecourse where I had been invited by Dr Keith RIX to talk to an audience mainly comprised of mental health professionals – including a large number of psychiatrists. I spoke mainly about how we should consider the investigation and prosecution of inpatients on psychiatric wards where there are assaults on staff or other patients. It was delightful to meet Dr Simon WILSON from the Institute of Psychiatry because he and I co-authored a published article on inpatient violence without having actually met! Having worked on that it was clear we’d sing from the same page and this proved to be the case. A gentleman who shared my distaste for what he called the ‘inappropriately dichotomous’ nature of the debate on diversion.
$85.00 including shipping.
Fighting for the ruling classes in their battle against the poor
what has your biggest struggle been as a model?
“Good fortune is what happens when opportunity meets with planning.” (Thomas Alva Edison)
Main menu: please say the option that best describes the issue you're calling about. For set up, password or connectivity issues, please say "tech. support". For billing questions or account services, say "billing". To hear these options again, you can say "repeat".
You start in again.
But this is way better than the Communards' version. Her chest, however, does seem to be out of all control.
Veteran Toronto Expo enthusiasts likely will find the show-exclusive set created for next week to be the best one yet, for it includes sequentially numbered rookies, unique memorabilia cards featuring towels used during the NHL All-Star Game (with swatches big enough to use following a post-game shower), a whole new roster of one-of-a-kind sketch cards, instant-win redemption cards good for autographed memorabilia and so much more.
“Are you a boy or a girl?” (OK, not so crazy) to which it will respond “Is this relevant?”
Susana, a 32-year-old Chicana who doesn't want to give her last name, goes by brownfemipower on the Women of Color blog. Her writing has been published on the Radical Women of Color Carnival. Pursuing a master's degree in Creative Writing at Eastern Michigan University and a single mom of two, Susana usually blogs late at night. She started blogging late last summer, but didn't start making community until sometime in September.
1/4 tsp Sriracha (chili paste with garlic)
When 180 degrees is reached, add the sweetener and flavoring, if desired. Leave the lid slightly ajar, and reset the thermometer to 120 degrees. Temperatures higher than this will kill off the good bacteria in the starter that make the yogurt.
I seem to function better when I have someone special in my life; someone to think and care about. Perhaps it’s simply something I’ve grown accustom to over all these years. I like knowing I’m part of someone else’s life and that they’re a part of mine. It gives me a sense that everything we do has more meaning.
We talked about life, travel, opera, wine food and colors. It is so interesting to compare how one operates from a corporate environment compared to my approach of operating purely on my gut and fancy.
Yeah not really the news I wanted. Now to see exactly bad it is... surgery or injections and therapy? Hummm... stay tuned.
I found this picture a while ago, whilst trying, I think, to identify a painter of something else entirely. I kinda snagged it into a "stuff to think about later" folder. I'm very bad, however at archiving sources, so I've no idea where I found it.
Active listings are DOWN
My Round the Bible in 40 Days project is gathering a good head of steam and I’ve just OK’s it’s material to go on the Caledcote site, where they have a great section on Bible resources already. With their permission, read on to see it how it goes:
Her answer was to become far more than an insurance seller. She said it was imperative to develop underwriting, actuarial support, wellness and compliance services. This year, several independents joined her firm to take advantage of those services. She expects that trend to continue.
Think of all those great Western movies where the WANTED poster tells you exactly what the bad guy looks like. One of my personal favourites is in Sergio Leone's For a Few Dollars More, where the evil laughing baddie El Indio is freeze-framed mid-cackle and the image becomes his WANTED poster.
diabetics must make to their diet and lifestyle habits cannot be a fad, they must be permanent and all-pervasive.
“I had a 4-year contract with National Junior College when I enrolled, meaning I would stay with NJC’s Integrated Programme for 4 years without taking O-Levels and such. This was technically not an MOE scholarship as it’s directly sponsored by another Chinese-related commercial group (from what I was told when I applied). However all of us scholars from China or ASEAN were monitored by MOE and our grant comes from MOE’s account (I’m not sure how the whole thing works.).” he wrote in a comment posted on The Temasek Times.
I’m not saying don’t go to Europe. It’s an amazing place with thousands of years of history and tons to do. Everyone should definitely go sometime in their life. What I am saying is when you’re young, lacking money and looking for adventure, go somewhere else. Europe, like always, will be there. Other places won’t.
Now, deductive reasoning is the process of coming up with a conclusion based on facts that have already been shown to be true. Hence, your conclusion will always be true. The facts that can be used to prove your conclusion deductively may come from accepted definitions, postulates (something assumed without proof) or axioms (universally accepted principle), or previously proved theorems (an idea or statement generally accepted without proof).
Quinn Lennox is searching for a missing friend when she stumbles into a dark otherworld that only she can see—and finds herself at the mercy of Arturo Mazza, a dangerously handsome vampire whose wicked kiss will save her, enslave her, bewitch her, and betray her.
WHAT: Relief goods drop-off
Zoo Animal:Red panda; so cute!
I went to a naturopath. My psychiatrist was displeased. (My naturopath, in her turn, was horrified.) I finished the initial treatment, started on the next part: we are trying out other medicines to help with anxiety, now. Plus herbs and supplements and yoga and meditation and it is constant effort, but it is working. Without informing Dr Psychiatrist, I steadily dropped my Klonopin intake. At last, I put my head down and bulled through the withdrawal. It wasn’t as bad as it could have been.
Gutshot; editor Conrad Williams (PS Publishing)
Fortunately, I had already completed my materials for tomorrow. We will review characterization and I have made a poster for character traits. My original idea was to laminate the poster and use Vis-A-Vis to write on it when we review. However, I forgot our laminating machine at school is messed up! So the students will have to create their own copy of my poster.
And Cat didn’t give a shit one way or the other….
5. The N. Ireland tribunal which cost the Party £4,000 has been paid in full.
One of the reasons given for the nomination of Pope John Paul II for sainthood is that he “whipped himself with a belt, even on vacation,” according to a new book. If that’s what it takes, why isn’t David Carradine a saint? What is the link between Catholicism and sadomasochism? As a former seminarian, perhaps you can explain this.
Linda Stewart has a follow-up two page article in the Belfast Telegraph in which the NIEA is slammed as a toothless body by green campaigners. The Minister finds himself in the unenviable position of trying to ride two horses simultaneously, planning service and the environment agency. The Telegraph carries a DOE claim that the resort proposal received 26 letters of objection and 4 of support; perhaps the Planning Service will add the missing ones to the 20 letters of objection and 1 of support that it has published online.
In these wonderful days of spring, take a moment or two to sit outside and just be still and know God.
I am betting that if we cut administration, paid teachers on according to their abilities, the ones that loved their jobs would be making 6 figures. I would be happy with that.
"So you go out, you look at an industry, you find people violating the law, you go aggressively after them. And we do have some pretty effective enforcement tools.
For a while now I’ve been taking more of a reuse rather than replace approach to purchases. Whether this is due to the current global financial situation I’m not sure. At certain points in the last five years I’d decide that I needed to replace my trusty old mountain bike with a new one. I’d duly jot down a specification of features I’d like only to find I’d written down the spec of my current bike and end up not bothering to replace it at all. This process took a further twist last year when I started reading about the resurgent interest in single-speed and hub geared bicycles. With the bike coming up for yet another new chain and rear cassette, I decided to go down the single-speed route as most of my riding these days is on the flat. Once again, I found myself hanging on to the old treader and just fitting a conversion kit. After a year or so of riding with just one ratio I’m a firm convert. I’m actually a bit fitter than I was, the bike is lighter, less cluttered, less noisy, stays cleaner longer and requires less maintenance. It’s still hard work, harder when your pedaling into the face of the wind, but my legs have coped and on the whole I continue to enjoy it.
The common prediction was that complacency is not an option. Jeffrey R. Hughes, GAMA International CEO, advised expecting constant and disruptive change. In short, learn to sail choppy seas. GAMA is an association for field leaders in the insurance and financial services.
Stay Away From: Benefit Erase Paste, a gloopy consistency like the Bobbi Brown, it comes on three colours but they are all very similar and quite pinky/orangey. Naat good for concealing. Worst of all like many of Benefit’s skin products Erase Paste contains Titanium Dioxide which makes a lot of people break out.
If angels were all that is true
And whosoever turns his back to them on such a day, unless it be a stratagem of war, or to retreat to a troop (of his own) -he indeed has drawn upon himself the wrath from Allah. And his abode is Hell, worst indeed is that destination! (V.8:16).
And I do mean hard-earned.
And with that the feds' case likely went down the drain. What a waste of time and money this witch hunt has been! Now it seems that Clemens will likely walk (and good for him): Pettite's testimony was what held the case together, with the only other witness a discredited, self-interested snitch trying to weasel out of prosecution himself.
Today, a massive parcel arrived, full of the winter clothes I ordered for my kiddies last week.
I’d stay in the garden with Him
19) Chicago Bears: DE Quinton Coples
If you were to look at Kristen Yartz's house in Dandridge, TN you would probably wonder if she was planning to open her own children's store. When in reality, after 4 years of children's consignment sales she has started offering a service that some mothers will find invaluable: Item prep and drop-off.
STARTED EARLY TOOK MY DOG by Kate Atkinson (Doubleday)
Every Sunday evening before going to bed, one of us would take off the round brass cover at the back and turn the key carefully, winding it just enough but not too tight; ensuring that the gentle ticking sound was there to see us through the week ahead. Somewhere along the way though, our routines changed, the regular winding became more sporadic, it turned from a soothing ritual to something of a chore.
vanilla buttercream frosting
Designated Agent and fulfill both its responsibility to distribute receipts to stakeholders of the public performance right under section 114(g) as well as its
“Ellen Linder”
Thanks everyone for the wonderful comments!!!
I have had a fantastic week and I saw a loss of 1.1 kilos taking me down to 103.8...I am on the right track....so why did I spend my Friday and Saturday eating everything and anything I could get my hands on? I feel disgusting. I have eaten all the wrong foods and over eaten...and yes PB'd a couple of times. I realise now that I just sat at home alone and decided that is what I felt like doing...eating.....I haven't done this in such a long, long time......I am disappointed in myself.
I refuse to be taken down so close to St. Patrick’s Day, and also, the weekend in general.
"Um... mostly just AAAAAGGGGHHHH!"
I say IKEA is “cheap” and that’s may be the wrong term – every single item I’ve purchased (furniture and otherwise) has held up GREAT. What’s your experience been with their products?
A reason to start over new
Hopefully by March I will have enough time to sit down and tell you all about Christmas Day, after Christmas, Mr. D., Shelby starting school and SO MUCH MORE!!!
I guess I have been able to keep myself busy planning for the upcoming craft markets I will be attending in Edmonton:
29. The Last Shot -- Lou Reed
That's the most epic dream I've ever had. It almost had it all. I wasn't too keen on jumping around settings and timepoints, but I did not have control of this night feature. I liked this dream so much that I submitted it to my local metaphysics office to interpret. I wasn't as pleased with the interpretation as the interpreter was with my dream. He explained that it almost echoed the "Cowboy Bebop" movie, which I had never seen, and gave general outlines how the dream could parallel with my life.
During the fifth race at a horse track several incidents occur, which are seemingly unrelated to the casual observer but, of course, are all part of a masterful plan as conveyed by the knowing looks between a number of men. Johnny Clay (Sterling Hayden) is the de facto mastermind of the job and a savvy crook who understands the odds: “Anytime you take a chance you better be sure the rewards are worth the risk because they can put you away just as fast for a $10 heist as a million dollar job.” He plans to take his cut and fly off with his girlfriend and childhood sweetheart Fay (Coleen Gray).
Now Liz must return to town and face the man who doesn’t know of their son’s existence. And this time she won’t have the option of making a quick getaway. Ethan and Liz can’t deny their passionate attraction, even after all these years. But will their desire be enough to spark a
Here in London, we used to have a collection of free newspapers that were handed out every evening by strange looking people whose sole aim, apart from handing you free papers, was to get in your way as you tried to get home from work, and thus made you so angry that you wanted to roll up two copies of said newspapers and then insert them slowly into their eye sockets due to the fact that they had made you missed your train for the umpteenth time.
gust of
We look forward to receiving your emails! :)
spitting venom in our water and telling us its tenderness
12g of baking powder
5 dubuisson
How do I fix that? I joined and committed to completing the new Bible study in the ladies ministry at my church. It is called Me, Myself, and Lies. It is all about the lies we speak to ourselves every day. I am determined to allow God's voice to boom out over the little mutterings of my own mind. This study is my chance to finally break down this stronghold of self-talk in my life and truly allow the word of God to be the voice I hear.
I put together some combinations with nothing particularly in mind other than what might look cute. Perhaps one day I can look back when I need some fabric inspiration. Lots of these are "kid inspired" but y'know...I have babies on the brain lately so cut me some slack.
palms for hands
How it went: I had a brilliant time. My favourite milongas are always the daytime ones, where I get super-relaxed and happy and dance better. I should have had the wit to pace myself better for Saturday night, but I enjoyed it more and more as I went along and I remember my last dance with a lot of joy, even though I was practically falling over.
He'Brew RIPA on Rye's newest batch was released in extremely limited quantities this week. IF you can find it, grab it.
We had a lovely walkabout and enjoyed the vivid colors that the sunny Spring day helped us capture.
The Boracay Initiative working with BARRIA Boracay is the Sustainable Tourism, Conservation and Social Responsibility frameworks Boracay Island and nearby Aklan towns with institutional partners Zero Carbon Resorts, Green Hotels & Clean Blue.
This is very important. Only leave a comment to tell me that you (or someone else) has voted. I know normally we have a nice chat there and I respond to all the comments, but not this time - it will interfere with my Random-Number-Generator-no-Jutsu.
1/2 part Rose’s lime juice
Now a new Chamber of Arts has been put forward as the strategy to support the “Arts Sector” in the region with local art hubs designated for certain geographical areas and a region-wide hub for multi-area projects.
Cressey Performance would like to invite you (athletes and parents) to attend an introduction to CP’s staff, training philosophies and services. Meet some of our professional baseball clients and learn about CP’s role in their career development.
I guess some would say my 12, almost 11, and 4 year olds are deprived. None of them have a personal phone. None of them have an ipod. None of them have a gaming system - either personal or family-sized. We don't even have a TV! When the economy tanked in late 2008 we did what we had to to survive. We moved from a 3000 square foot house to a 1500 square foot rental to the 1000 square foot home we currently own. My three kids - gasp! - shared one room for the first two years we were in this house! My two oldest children even received free lunches from February 2009 through May of 2009. And they were a godsend. However, while on these free lunches we weren't buying souped-up cars, any electronics, cigarettes (that now cost around $5/pack! - I remember when they were like $1.50!), etc., etc. It is all about priorities. Why should someone else have to pay for my child's food because I am unwilling to? Note I didn't say unable - those people need help for sure.
For that to happen, those new figures need to be treated on a more equitable basis. And in an increasingly multi-party system the broadcasters must stop trying to pick winners and leave that to the electorate.
Wi his last gasp his gab (mouth) did gape;
improved transportation
Ky’s next words were “put that bone in my hand,” which I did.
Members of family and friends were all there with gorgeous gifts that included the necessities as well as some fabulous vintage-styled toys and some modern day ones, too.
The new economic czar’s other so-called economic papers are as follows:
2. Enchilada Casserole. Mostly, it’s less work than enchiladas. Layer sauce, tortillas, vegetables, cheese, and beans or meat in a casserole dish. Top with cheese. Bake for about 45 minutes at 375 or until heated through and lightly browned on top.
especially about getting candy!
See you back next week for a fabby new challenge, meantime where did I put my glass???
Since then the band continued to gig around the country and have recently released a new single called “Dark Hearts” which was released in March.
The geeks come out from their session. Sounded good, what I heard. Got a new song about Debbie. Something about love and planes.
Hear my prayer
For the boygroups that SM Entertainment produced, there’s no such word as ‘fail’. They choose a gemstone out of thousands of trainees and polish it for years to make it become a star. The idol groups prepared like this by SM, which is a big company with planned foundations, become the best stars after only a year.
Cast : Cheech Marin, Eric Roberts, Julie Hagerty, Robert Carradine, Buck Henry, Louise Lasser, Cindy Williams, Andrea Martin, Cliff De Young, Dion Anderson, Peter Boyden, Nicholas Wyman, Michael Luciano, Amy Glass
There are the times I wasn’t to sure about life personally.I think the shadows,pains, burdens can over take a lot us in life.But, how can you hide? What are you hiding from?I can’t imagine me hiding from life or even love.There are things that you can only achieve if you don’t stop dancing the dance of life, such as joy, happiness, love, etc. To obtain these we have to “believe we can fly” away, and above, the shadows rather than spending time wallowing in self-pity and being blind to everything outside of the shadows.
Pull out your cooler and start loading it up. Do you have room for ice? What are your priorities? What really needs to be kept cool? What can you realistically eat before it goes bad?
Where does this leave me with the challenge?
But you know what they say about the weather. “If you don’t like it, just wait five minutes.” It took about an hour for the fog to start burning off but I had a fantastic time taking some shots along the harbour. Many images end up looking pretty surreal.
I created this dish to have the most flexibility as possible so that people could add what they liked as necessary. The slaw is very basic, I used sliced avocados instead of guacamole, the jalapenos are there as a "choose your own adventure in spiciness" factor, and extra cilantro is offered on the side. As a side note, I also made fish sticks as well, which Daughter #2 and her friend decided tasted AWESOME in a tortilla with a nice big dollop of salsa on top. Go figure.
Lizzy played the part of the big sister who helped her little sister understand the "True Meaning of Christmas." Here she is reading it out of the Beginner's Bible.
I have this scene I'm writing in the current work-in-progress, and it's taking me a long time to complete. I'm not avoiding it, exactly, but I know I'm taking more time than I should, and only yesterday I realized it's because this is the last scene for a character I've come to really like.
Some would say I'm living in paradise, and I pretty much agree. I must be dreaming, though. I think I need an extra chocolate just to make sure this is all real. Then again, my friends, this is Post-Christmas: time to eat vegetables, limit yourself to five chocolates a day, and stop putting your Christmas presents into piles just to look at them over and over again.
Thank you for your overwhelmingly kind response to my comments last week about the challenges facing the fire service in Detroit. I have read your thoughts again and again.
Lauren Oliver delivers an electrifying follow-up to her acclaimed New York Times bestseller, delirium. This riveting, brilliant novel crackles with the fire of fierce defiance, forbidden romance, and the sparks of a revolution about to ignite.
Yeah! Ignore the bad stuff. That'll solve the problem.
Pink ruffle design with white and black centers in black and white ivy patterned cupcake liners.
Wasn’t the world still in Black and White way back in 2008?
your retail pangs!
This is the second in a series of eagerly awaited and incredibly popular Tarot reading posts.
Have a great Saturday !
Not getting as much done in the house as I wanted.
Opportunity! We organize a group that has tools set up to make 3-1-1, police, fire, and general Google inquiries come to us, and have these same tools help you and other bee-enthusiasts gain access to these bees, seek mentors in helping capture swarms, and find homes for the bees after you have caught them!
Heat the dissolved sugar to achieve a syrup of one thread consistency.
All weekend we were crazy busy with activities surrounding her birthday including Cinco de Mayo and the Kentucky Derby and B's swim banquet..... On the girl's birthdays I usually write a post about them. Last night at 9:30 having just gotten home from the swim banquet, K says, "Hey, you didn't write my birthday post". It's funny when something is important to them and you truly have no idea.
I was reminded of a quote by Annie Dillard:
Less awkward and more endearing than Michael Scott and Liz Lemon, but just as hilarious, Leslie Knope has suddenly become the most likable lead character on NBC Thursday nights. She is so upfront about her strangeness that you will either laugh or gasp nonstop, whichever one happens first. “Practice Date” was an opportunity for Amy Poehler to run completely free and crazy with her performance. It was one of those episodes whose hilarity is best explained by listing quotes, so here are some more:
Now to the point of the title of the post. One of the mini set themes found in 2011 Topps Allen & Ginter was called "Uninvited Guests." It is a ten-card set of houses and other locations that have had infamous ghost sightings. The backs of each of these cards even has a brief summary or two about what goes on at each location. Perusing the checklist, it looks like either the TAPS or the GAC have been to almost all of these locations (save possibly the White House and Amityville). Now at the National last year, we were able to find three of the ten cards in the set. She was hoping to find the rest at the show last weekend. Suffice it to say, we are now in possession (pun intended) of all but ONE of the cards, and it will haunt us to no end.
the rejected.
‘Okay, look, I think we should all try and get settled into our cabins, maybe have a little bit of a rest, get our heads down for a bit,’ Andy suggested. ‘We’ve got a meeting with the Cruise Director this evening, remember? So maybe we should meet up in a couple of hours or so. In the Show Lounge. I’d like to start getting a feel for the place, you know? Start thinking
14. In recent weeks we have come into possession of the books and records of the late President Soekarno, and all the codes and ledgers of the Global Accounts. The size of these accounts can be seen by reviewing the Collective Agreement between the Garuda Memorial Hilton Indonesia and the Green Memorial Hilton Geneva, established, structured and made operational between 1961 and final signature in 1972. Under this Agreement the assets of the international collateral combined were established and brought forward, then, within a short period of time misused to change the operating systems of banks.
Let's put a pin in the fact that Jeep. Is. Using. The. Most. Annoying. Ad. Technique. Ever. Created. for the moment, hmm? Just say the complete goddamn sentence, all in one go. I promise I can stay awake through the whole thing. Breaking it up into tiny nibblets is not going to make it sound any more profound. Wanna see?
and I placed my design on top. I covered it with a poly curtain and wetted it down. Now, here's the thing. I can spend up to or over an hour depending on the size of the piece wetting and gently rubbing the design in place to start penetrating the fibers into the silk. This part is verrry important to me because if I don't pay attention and give the pattern enought time and rubbing, it will not adhere and falls off in the fulling process or worse the edges don't felt onto the silk and the piece looks sloppy.
09/02/2011 BUY 0.01 eurgbp 0.87695
When sweet, elderly, mama piped up: ( Loudly, mind you )
Even at the top end, though, you have to be selective. Here is our guide to where, what and why to buy overseas to minimise your risk.
None are interested in carrying on the family business.
Before serving prepare a tempering of Ghee , dried red chilies, kasuri methi and any seasoning if required and pour onto the serving bowl.
Key Employees 13
Look for one near you soon.
In search of that valley,
If You're Looking for A Good Time
A new study shows that Apple is raking in $70,000 daily from Newsstand. The study, conducted by Distimo says that the top 100 publications brought in this much, and only from the United States. The most money came in from News Corp’s The Daily, followed by the New York Times and The New Yorker Magazine. In October last year, Apple introduced Newsstand as part of iOS5 which enabled users to view Newspapers and Magazines they’ve subscribed to. Apple takes a 30% cut from each sale and gives away 70% to the content creators. Publishers can also let existing subscribers view digital editions of content to which they already subscribe, however they’re not allowed to link to outside Web sites where subscriptions can be struck outside of the App Store.
I cooked it at 180ºC for about 50 minutes, left it to cool slightly in the tin for 10 minutes then turned it out on a plate. You get a few lovely juices dripping out and it´s best served at room temperature.
And now we have things like this:
My advice to you is to just stick to the stock market.
A couple of weeks ago I received an invitation to go along to the Sculpta Cosmetic Clinic in Glasgow for their pre-Christmas open evening. Although I'm covered in tattoos and have loved changing my appearance since the age of 12, the very thought of cosmetic surgery leaves me feeling a little queasy...
Share an evening with your family as you experience the music, shops, food and fun in the picturesque Irish town of Killarney. Who knows what treasures will be yours–you might just find the pot of gold at the end of a rainbow! Visit the Adventures by Disney hospitality desk for recommendations.
I also punched some leaves from the Bird Builder punch in greens and flowers with the 4 sided flower from the Itty bitty punches set in regal rose and melon mambo. I took a large flower from the Boho blossoms punche out in the middle and put a dimensional in the center. Use the scorer with the ball end to push down on the flowers on a mousepad to create some dimension and squish them in and put some more around the edges with tombow multimono liquid glue to set some more around the edges to create a round mound of flowers. Set smallest pearls in the center of every flower. I love this die so much~ my kids better have some girl grandbabies some day who I hope will love this stuff that I keep accumulating!
but the raspberries, on the other hand, seem to require gentle coercion.
If the Irish do indeed get money from the EU, it will be interesting to see the reactions from across the EU.
The photobook is on the ascent, with no sign of stopping. Despite – or perhaps thanks to – the digitizing of photography, the ‘old’ medium of the book is tremendously popular among photographers today. They see the photobook as an ideal form for presenting their photos and telling their story. The selection of the images and paper, design, typography and text are all-important in this. The photobook is almost as old as photography itself, and in retrospect was the most important means of distribution for photography, both among photographers themselves and between the image makers and their audience. Books have a long life, and can be distributed internationally; as a result, they have an enormous range across time and space.
HA! All of my music is on my I-Phone. I listen to a whole range of music from Death Cab For Cutie to Erasure to Stone Temple Pilots to Nine Inch Nails. I listen to music to put me in a particular mood…not the other way around. If that makes any sense.
Bring the mixture back up to a boil, and then reduce the heat a bit but make sure it keeps bubbling. Continue to cook for at least 2 hours but ideally more. DO NOT PUT THE LID ON THIS SAUCE AT ANY POINT. When it starts to get too dry add in more water. The idea is to keep reducing it and concentrating the flavours.
On the babywearing front, I purchased some clearance fleece to make a baby wrap with. It wasn't quite 5 yards, but I bought it anyways ... and I very much have NOT mastered this thing yet. I tried to rock it when we went out to dinner yesterday, but it just didn't work out. I think it's long enough, but I guess we'll see. The pattern is beyond cute, though. I think I'm going to make some fleece blankets out of the other 2/3s of the material. There's enough for two baby-sized ones ... and one of my oldest friends is having a boy in a few months! After a sea of pink, I'm excited that somebody else is having blue. It's just too bad that she lives half a state away. My fault, of course ... not hers.
This wouldn’t hold true for Marty. I can’t imagine Marty doing anything heroic because that would require him to put someone else before himself. Marty is too selfish and egotistical for that. He ruins lives around him. He has little or no regard for anyone else. I don’t believe there’s any hope for Marty.
My brother, Sean, who also learned to cook and bake under the wings of Chef Marcel, taught me a few things or two...and more. We made a beautiful cake from the Bon Appetit Magazine cover for a December issue in the 1980's. I was so proud that I did another one!! I feel so fortunate to have the love of cooking and baking that I share that same passion with my daughter, Amanda! She is quite the accomplished cook and baker, TOO!!
I could not ask for more. Packing boxes and cleaning closets seem rather insignificant knowing my new residence is everything I could hope for. Surrounded by an enormous lush Oregon garden my summer afternoons shall be spent drawing in the sun and picking strawberries, kiwi, raspberries and grapes. Barbecues shall abound and Belle can run around like a wild monkey.
Inks: CTMH Chocolate
Coredinations Cardstock
It's been a week.
Inside I have now found the price list - its tucked away in the small drinking corridor in the top right corner above the hatch. Its a weird place to put it because there's usually someone stood at that hatch so you are unlikely to be served there. Perhaps they were saving the newly unencumbered view of the woodwork on the front bar.
“Who was handed over to death for our trespasses and was raised for our justification.” (Rom 4:25)
Fred Grady – Drums,Keith Harper – Trumpet, Joseph Henderson - Sax
She's so nice and sweet and her book just sounds amazing! Look at this summary!
So... if I had a boy I would be thrilled and sad simultaneously. Knowing my chances of raising a daughter were gone would be sad and would add to the loss for me.
Solitude is no longer just a dream. I know it’s real because I’m seeing it with my own eyes; and it’s breathtaking. I had so many doubts on my sea-voyage over here. So many unknowns. Just getting a glimpse of the suspended city from a distance, I know I made the right decision by coming to Skyrim. After a few more minutes of silently staring in awe, I finally return to my senses, and decide to get moving again so that I may stare at Solitude from within its walls.
Dutch Courage: A quick swig of liquor will recover 1d4 hit points. These hit points will disappear after 1 hour. This only works once per wound.
He is more than a magician, more than a motivational speaker and more than storyteller. His goal is to spark the creative magic in everyone he speaks to. For more than two decades he has entertained and inspired individuals to live up to their potential. Bob has a passion to bring wonder, to ignite creativity and to inspire others to make a difference.
Now that doesn't mean I will ever live them down mind you.
The Farmer John lard is NOT hydrogenated.
Anyways, our theme this week is "Lighten Up!" All my friends in the northern hemisphere, approaching the tail end of a long winter of carb-loading and casseroles, are getting in the mood for spring and some lighter fare. Being at the fag end of summer, as we are here in the southern hemisphere, we have salad produce not just in abundance, but at their very best, so this week's theme was right up my alley (which is not always the case).
Then Breivik have called both TV2 and NRK and asked why they did not cover what happened. According to Breivik, the editors then have replied that it was not "news worthy".
Michael David Ferugio, 37, New York, N.Y.
We did find the motion of the boat bothersome at times. On the second night, the ship was very rocky due to high winds, and we all rushed through dinner and retreated to our beds by 7:30 pm, after I fed them all a Gravol. Things settled down the next day, thankfully, as we landed in the Bahamas for our first port of call.
My colleague, Frank Young (see his great blog on John Stanley here) and I have an article in Alter Ego #105, which has just been published. It's an examination of a bizarre Nazi horror story that was published before the Comics Code, and then re-published after the Code, with some absurd changes made to it. Many thanks to editor Roy Thomas and his team for doing such a great presentation and for using much of our original copy, untouched, which first appeared on our Comic Book Attic blog. The issue is a fascinating look at the effect of the Comics Code, and includes some eye-opening examples from Plastic Man, among others. The digital version is only $2.95, and you can download it instantly. Click on the image below to order!
Kitia conquered her opponent, Karna, with tricks. She used sonic grenades, sedatives, spices to overcome the obstacles and bring her opponent down. Khuure’s new clan is dangerous and not to be underestimated. Being cautious of a small human child is far less degrading than losing to one would be. Khavu regards Juma with deadly seriousness. Any and all means at disposal will be taken to make sure Juma doesn’t win.
3 Drops of Angostura
Bitch had claimed the sofa for herself, reclining with two dogs up beside her. She was rubbing her forearms, which were probably strained from controlling the more unruly dogs with the chains. She glared up at me, and there was something ugly in her expression.
Sherri generously offered to give away an eBook copy of her book, To Dance Once More!! Open Internationally!!
ISBN-10: 0802723527
drool like sewer
~ Most people will assume you think you are better than them. Again not true, and don't care. Neither of you are better, you are simply travelling along a different path. Different strokes and all that.
6) Find a secret hiding place and watch the look of wonder on your neighbors' faces as they come outside to find that they've 'been egged.'
Kirin 42.8%
3 offer
Malika Zarrar: Divorce is inevitable in this case, because he is a pervert. The Islamic scholars and jurisprudents concur that if during sex, a woman cannot avoid being watched, touched, or heard – she must refrain from having sex.
Around the world, black handprints are appearing on doorways, scorched there by winged strangers who have crept through a slit in the sky.
Well, I for one am sick and tired of baby boomers (or, if you prefer, the '60s generation) being blamed for every social and economic ill the country faces. To show how bad it's gotten, did you know, for example, that the rise of the armed right-wing militias of the sort that produced Timothy McVeigh were the fault of the '60s? It's obvious: In the '60s people said "question authority," and these people mistrust government, so, QED, right? That lame argument was actually made in the New York Times several years back.
Democratic leaders are concerned that with revenue projections falling short, they are going to have to make more cuts that affect unions and others who also have concerns about changes to pension benefits.
the bible talks about there is a time for everything, there is a time to talk and a time to be quiet. oh how we are quick to jump into action, share words of wisdom or biblical advise to hurting people when all they want is our listening ear!
She pulls a face. 'Urgh. I told you, I don't like boys.' Quite.
repressive government—but the U.S. is pushing Latin American countries
One . . . didn't.
sour cream
Now that she’s filled with rage and a need for revenge, she wants to get rid of both Park Ha and Tae Yong. This makes Tae Mu fall in love with her even more.
Before I get into today’s book review, I wanted to mention that I saw the last Harry Potter movie today. My thoughts? Good, for what it was. There was a bunch of stuff either left out or changed, but those were mainly necessary (details left out of previous movies, flow, etc.). A few, however, were made for the sake of dramatics. Not necessary, in my opinion. It didn’t hurt the movie much, really, but it did mess with my preconceived notions. Also, I think their choice of actors for the “19-years later” scene didn’t work. I’ll say no more on the subject for fear of ruining anything. Either message me or comment using veiled terms; I loath spoilers.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to trust my experiences as emotions and feelings because they just seem to authentic as if they are really me, and in this not ever ask myself the question if these experiences as emotions and feelings as myself support what is best for all life in all ways.
Jack Hayes
only after the sun too becomes bored and impatient
It’s a French film,who I think after earlier releases have to be best nation for horror,followed by the Asian film market.
Off the Boulevard of St. Michel
The smallest child knows right from wrong. Even babies know right from wrong. The story has been told of an ethnic family and the baby in arms, who could have barely said a few words, referring to his daddy as “uncle Blackman’. The mother was petrified because she never had the conversation with the child but somehow he knew there were differences.
The Mathebula Communal Property Association in Mpumalanga applied for a R110000 loan from the Land Bank in April last year — the same month that Pamodzi received its funding.
And they offer advice with scarcely a trace of superiority. To do otherwise, of course, would be un-Canadian, even American. All the better for them: revenge, as they know, is best served cold.
Continue this process 3 more times, then end with a final layer of 6-8 sheets of dough. Brush the top layer of dough with butter, too. This isn’t a diet-friendly recipe, but it’s oh-s0-good!
Ribbon, gems, stickles, plain papers and cardstock from my stash.
Oh, but it’s clear skies we’re under
Posted by Justin "The Claw" at 1:10 PM 1 comments
the results after week number three:
- Seacrest out.
Chop the chocolate as finely as possible and place in a heat proof bowl.
26And they shall bring the glory and honour of the nations into it.
I was extremely tired after my workout and needed some caffeine. Dunkin Donuts to the rescue! I felt energetic after my coff coolatta. I know I shuld be going to DD, but it’s too much restriction. I don’t drink coffee, I quit soda, so I am basically not drinking any caffeine except for the snapple or two i am drinking each week. So this week I was just done and wanted my caffeine. And the weight watchers is great if you don’t go out. I feel like a big dejected loser when I have some scrambled eggs and ONE pancake and find out it is 20points+ like seriously? there is just no point. Anwyays that is my WW dieting gripe of the week.
Peacock @ screen 53 % masked from the focus areas.
6-I'm an Air Force Wife.
So the party’s going well – everyone’s congratulating the Big Bang on pulling the evening off (especially those Black Holes, they can be such suck-ups), and we balloon-popping humans dancing by ourselves in the corner think we’ve got a fair bit figured out.
His glass is more than half empty.
As soon as she was free Chase trotted off along the fence line to do her business, so I was standing on the path, waiting to pick up. ‘Cause you know… I’m responsible.
MamasBoy is his Godfather
BE. Extraordinary,
and has a lovely little sister
I have only ever worked as a Staff member at the event, and this was my second year doing so. This year I worked Back of House, the crew that handles Main Stage set-up and monitors. As a Stage Tech, I gave direction and advice for staging and micing where I could, being an audio student myself, and I think I was supposed to run monitors at some point, but never really got my place behind the board. Anyhow, the purpose of this post may be less about what actually occured at Sakuracon (besides everything Main Stage) and more about what my Back of House Staff badge actually enabled me to experience this year.
AAAAAHHHHHHH... getting older REALLY SUCKS! (I'm such a wimp!) Three band aids and lots of peroxide later, I will be just fine... bruises aside, of course! Tomorrow is my first of 5 full bike to run brick workouts before the race... band aids and all! :-)
The same applies to all other natural resources that feed into the livestock production process, such as water or nutrients.”
I.D.K.H.T.H.M.B.H. is one of your catchier songs. Why isn’t it on the record?
I like classic, hard boiled private eye stories. It has been a long time since a good one has made it to film. Magnum PI is the most recent example period, but as far as theatrical releases go, I think you have to go all the way back to 1974’s Chinatown. Even then, e of the key elements that makes Chinatown great is its setting during the golden age of detective films--the ‘30’s-’40’s.
I would like to think otherwise, but maybe she’s right.
THANKS AND LOOK FORWARD TO HEARING FROM YOU,
I've had a very productive week in the studio!
MAC MSFN medium
Her packaging came with some black marabou, so I took it off to wrap around my candle holder.
She said that he needed a prescription, but she didn't want to go out late by herself on a Saturday night. Captain America said that I could go with her, if that would make her feel better. I think she was glad :)
If Paterson takes over, he'd have to stand for election in 2010. As a not-quite-incumbent, he'd have a significant head start, but he also might be vulnerable to a challenge. Nassau County Executive Tom Suozzi, who lost badly to Spitzer in the Democratic primary in 2006, opposes Atlantic Yards, and just might run again.
Long Shot: Woody Harrelson (Lead Actor)
I've reposted it because I have a strong feeling that D. Greaves of Middleton is also featured on the cover of this book, which I found last week:
NATO has secured a mobile, integrated, combat-tested global expeditionary force for the West.
The tree looked forward to the following day, when they would deck it again with fruit and toys, candles and gold. "Tomorrow I shall not quiver," it decided. "I'll enjoy my splendor to the full. Tomorrow I shall hear about Humpty-Dumpty again, and perhaps about Ivedy-Avedy too." All night long the tree stood silent as it dreamed its dreams, and next morning the butler and the maid came in with their dusters.
Mr Modi, who was blamed for not doing enough to stop the horrific 2002 anti-Muslim riots in the state after the burning of a train carrying Hindu pilgrims, has modelled himself as a no-nonsense economic reformer leading one of India’s fastest-growing states.
Sending you all love and thanks for all the support, I'll be back
I also made sure to research selling prices on most items before listing them, to make that yes or no decision. I looked up a Playstation 2 video game... it was selling for a couple of dollars on eBay, thinking about the time to list, the time to package and ship... again, not worth it.
This was not what I had expected at all. She had a great day and was excited about her school.
R. Who made heaven and earth.
We better our beginnings or we fail.
Two Honest gamblers.”
We believe whatever the Holy Bible says (all 66 books, Genesis to Revelation). For how we do this, please see Our Hermeneutics and Judging. Scripture is our first and last and everything in between authority. The Word of God is our life and our salvation (Matthew 4:4; John 1:1; 14:6; James 1:21). By it He has given us eternal life, and our hope is in His Word (Psalm 119:49-50). Okay, so you say – Matt what’s the problem – unfortunately, here is what is in their doctrine:
but maybe once a week! It was like a hair care battle field man! Aren’t
So I have planned a solo trip into town on Saturday with only one requirement in mind - something that fits. My husband made a very astute observation - "I know what will happen you'll come back with nothing and be in a foul mood for the rest of the day." "You won't find anything in the first shop so this will set you up for the rest of the trip". As you can gather he's not looking forward to seeing me return stormy faced and then having the predictable "I'm so fat" conversation.
I never knew the kids called her "Mrs Jim".I guess they couldnt get their Yorkshire tongues around "Zimnoch"!
Our creative ideas come from our experience, either from things we have seen and can remember, or from stuff that happened way back and has got replayed to us through our subconsious. Interacting with others should be one of the richest experiences we can have and should give us all kinds of ideas. Maybe talking through a screen isn't the richest way of doing it, (and I personally do not find it addictive), but it's surprising what things our minds will latch on to and start to use. No, if on-line social networks pose a threat to our creativity it will be because they lead us to divert said creativity into trying to be as witty and entertaining and insightful in person as we are in our books. But this is a problem authors and artists have always had.
Thou art more lovely and more temperate.
Take Christendom, and thy first friend I'll be.
Well, I’m frantically trying to find new work due to a rise in shutdowns at my current employer, as he needs increasing amounts of holidays and sabaticals.
This guy was a rank amateur. His tone of voice instantly betrayed his insincerity. How you say things matters, kids. More importantly, his premise was completely unbelievable. Why on earth would anyone call a fast food restaurant for something like this? The only thing this prank call had going for it was shock value. This also got him nowhere because he failed to anticipate that he’d be speaking to a jaded fast food worker.
More shopping was done today although very little was bought.
Perhaps it is in this Grushenka origin story, we discover the roots of my deep-seated sarcasm and love of money.
Gracefully twinkling like twisted stars
I hear they’re safe as houses and mechanically they’re sound
Later in the day, Nibras was startled when an associate of Mr. Think showed up at his house, extending an invitation to visit as soon as possible. A little while later Nibras was knocking on Mr. Think’s office door. The chief himself received him with a firm handshake and a reassuring smile, he lead him inside and they sat on low cushions. They exchanged pleasantries for a while and then Mr. Think cut right to the subject that prompted the urgent summon.
Note that many hotels will quote prices per person, including meals, as there are few restaurants on the island. Most lodges close during the rainy season, April and May. U.S. dollars are accepted.
Drawn in the early 1930s during the height of imperialism and anti-communist sentiments, the Marxists were for Herge the ultimate evil force that pillaged resources from poor peasants whilst glorifying themselves to the outside world.
It is a reminder to myself that as hard as I try something will come out of it. That is what I hope, and that is what I am trying to remember as every day I come home to see "no messages" on my answering machine.
Next, cut up a couple of hot dog wieners. Any brand will do...whatever your family likes. Little rounds would be fun in this, but I am still paranoid about my kiddos choking on hot dogs so I cut my little rounds into halves.
I have a lovely collection of vintage buckles, which I am yet to use. My favourites are those made from wood or mother of pearl. I'm currently pondering whether to make some belts or incorporate them all into my bag designs.
I was also fascinated but the group of baby Vasayan Warty Pigs....
Bru is getting older and usually just supervises. "Over that way! No, over there! Hurry, go go!"
3 medium eating apples
Statistically, over 400 billion cups of coffee are consumed every year, which is why coffee also happens to be the second most traded product in the world. In America alone, over 450 millions cups of Java are consumed on a daily basis, where the typical coffee drinker imbibes an average of three and a half cups a day. While it is already evident that the production and sales of coffee is healthy to any economy (especially in Brazil), what most health experts now are questioning is whether coffee is beneficial to one’s body in the long run.
"Er … Debase the beef canoe? Why does that strike me as not right?"
Here’s one of my favourite photos from her second shop:
I repeat: I am still alive.
Note to Thabito: considering the fact that you support our continued suffering, don’t count on that “unflinching support.” Better to open your eyes to reality and count on years of bitterness and resentment after the hopeful transition to democracy on our beloved island. Time to take those blinders off, eh?
Step 1: Place FunBites cutter on top of food. Remove topper and set to the side.
Anything is possible, and this moment is all we have. Something is only a mistake if we don't evolve and grow. Every moment is an opportunity to re-tune, to consider, "Why am I doing this? Does it feel good?"
The GunVault Multi-Deluxe is a sturdily built, steel handgun safe with a spring-loaded front door and battery operated locking mechanism that can be opened with the keypad or a barrel-type back-up key provided with the safe. We have had ours for over ten years and it operates without fail, although we do change the AA batteries every six months when we change the batteries in the smoke alarms.
The weather has been unsettled with rain squalls and some thunderstorms; however, it looks pretty good for the next few days. We will keep our fingers crossed.
(2) First rising.—This allows the yeast plants conditions and time to produce carbonic acid gas, until the dough is distended to twice its original size.
Neither the CFZ crew or our British Columbia Scientific Cryptozoology Club (BCSCC) field work team saw anything out of the ordinary at Lake Windermere, but I am fairly excited about the prospect of revisiting the lake to ascertain whether this unknown creature is a cryptid or an extraordinarily large and unusual eel.
*Ink: Brilliance Coffee Bean;
You get a better perspective of what they “have to have’ and what they would “like to have”.
Or, indeed, a photo of two corpses?
With remixes with Gorillaz, Lady Gaga, and even Journey, I think Avicii has stumbled on something with his goes-with-anything beat. Skrillex may have taken home the Grammy for his womps (he did deserve it) but Avicii still needs a mention. Without him, Flo wouldn’t have his hottest single probably since Right Round, and thousands of mixers have a great new toy to play with. Keep up the good work, gents!
THE AVENGERS THE Templars THE BRIEFS Youth Of Today AGGROLITES TIM BARRY STREET DOGS Manic Hispanic
Grade for the day: A+
attributes could be measured for each object.
We gave plenty of words in anger
Inspiral Carpets Saturn 5 UK
THE ACCUSATIONS
“Our government is the first government in a long time that has actually cared about the environment,” she responded.
Roberts Catholic church
Some league leaders fear that such an amendment could give the ANC a reason to dissolve the league altogether, but Malema has denied that the amendment was illegally done.
It was a moment of classic parental overreach on my part. Correctly answering this kind of question would mean that he understood the concept and that his mind is agile enough to think around this kind of idea when it comes at him from another angle. It would also, most importantly in retrospect, validate my own efforts to teach him something. In this, his success would be my success, his failure would be my failure. Somewhere I vaguely I heard the Sirens singing.
For those days that are not perfect but you keep a smile on your face, that is happy delight. Happy to not let the world get to you as painful as it might be. Delight in the feeling and knowing tomorrow is another day. We must try our best to be positive and love one’s self and keep in mind that there is someone in the world in a much worse shape than you. And if that person is near you or not too far off, a smile from you could make their day turn around, and inspire them to smile too. Pay it forward, and work on smiling, it’s a gift.
I looked at my cell. Noting the time, I gulped. Any minute now....
Without him afterwards may have to be
10:06: Call from substitute teacher in Art informing that my students are behaving badly. I go in and look around scowling. Not happy! Not happy! Noise has quieted dramatically; Art class commences.
That's me, Rene-Magritte-style, with my elegant hardback copy (and our dwarf lemon tree, just to give it some California cred).
He remembered the summer the picture had been taken. He’d been home from Fort Benning. His mother and Mrs. Addison had worked hard to put together a picnic for his friends to gather. If DJ remembered correctly, Jessica had been too busy with beginning wedding plans to attend. Or was it an engagement party? He didn’t remember the exact reason for her absence but he remembered that the picnic had been fun. He spent a considerable amount of time that afternoon talking to Meg and playing flag football with friends. It had been a good day. His father had been behind the camera, DJ remembered. They’d leaned together to smile for him.
A chaise was a pleasure or travelling carriage that was usually open and low with four wheels and drawn by one or two ponies. A Post Chaise was a chaise used with rented horses and was always painted yellow and often referred to as “a yellow bounder”. Post chaises were controlled by a postillion riding one of the horses.
HSDPA cat 6, maximum speed 3.6 Mbps (DL)
In these newsreels Grass “would see Germany surrounded by enemies, valiantly fighting what had been defensive battles abroad – on Russia’s endless steppes, in the burning sands of the Libyan Desert, along the protective Atlantic Wall, at the bottom of the sea – and on the home front I would see women turning out grenades, men assembling tanks, a bulwark against the Red Tide. The German folk in a life-and-death struggle; Fortress Europe standing up to Anglo-American imperialism at great cost…” and every day, the long casualty lists.
In a saucepan, sift together sugar and cornstarch. Stir in corn syrup, water, salt and margarine. Place over medium heat and stir until sugar dissolves. Cover pan and bring to a boil for 2 or 3 minutes. Uncover, place thermometer in pan and cook to 256 - 266 degrees F. The lower temperature will result in a chewier taffy, the higher a more brittle texture. Remove from heat and add food color and flavoring. Stir gently, pour into prepared dish/pan.
Cooking
1) Make your attacks count, no more sloppy crappy attacks. This is counterproductive.
And the fire I couldn’t light
Sandi
In fact, I feel like I have to justify my every decision. What I'm having for lunch, why there's no bread in, why I'm on the computer instead of hoovering.
Furthermore this analysis identifies key sub-networks such as IL-2:IFN-γ:TNF-α that might be targeted in restoring normal immune function.
ISBN: 1565126807
He remembered using the word “apek” for the dear old ice cream man who comes in the afternoon and cheer up the neighbourhood kids with his tasty and colorful ice cream.
20. Tequila Makes Her Clothes Fall Off -- Joe Nichols
I’m kinda appalled at how financially insecure this current generation is. Credit card debt is at record highs, people are spending way outside their means, hardly anybody is saving, much less investing. To make matters worse, you can’t rely on the government. Welfare is one big pyramid scheme that’s collapsing with our aging population. This is why I’m writing this post. I think that I’m very fortunate that back in high school, my math teacher went to the trouble of teaching me about investing. Mrs Farlow, I’m dedicating this post to you. I may have built on the lessons you taught me with the knowledge gleamed from many older and wiser than me, but you started it all.
Here's a nice little play set from good smile company that caught my eye some time ago.
I started with a card base of SU Vintage Violet and layered with patterned papers from the My Mind's Eye Miss Caroline Fiddlesticks 6x6 pad. I machine-stitched around all the panels. I used Spellbinders Floral Doily Motifs and Parisian Accents diecuts for my frame and corner accents. I added Buttercup Liquid Pearls to both. My sweet Magnolia image is Tilda Holding Daffodil from the Butterfly Dreams collection. I printed her on Cryogen White and colored her with my Copics. I added a bit of Yellow Stickles to the daffodil. I cut her out and popped her up on the motif frame. The sentiment is from Paulette at Create With TLC. A ribbon bow and button and a few Wild Orchid Crafts flowers finished up my card.
Suddenly, I had a different picture of who I really was, and I was humiliated. Secretly, I had always taken a little pride and self-esteem from my ability to analyze the h*** out of anything. Over the years, I’d developed a reputation as a somewhat wise person, always able to present a matter from several different view-points. I had assumed God had granted me my childhood prayer to be blessed with the gift of wisdom, and even at my worst moments, when I was the furthest from God that I’d ever been, I would try to be careful with that gift as to not have Him take it away from me. I had always perceived it as an answered prayer. To some degree, I thought we Christians had all been given three breasts, to varying levels like the parable of the talents.
Lollipop Sticks
You will find eReader covers, book covers for large and small paperbacks, and coffee cozies.
I started to Blog in earnest.
Don’t forget to click on the images for a more stimulating view.
i do not need to explain more, like me likewise..
The increasing social isolation has been attributed to Facebook according to some researches. The increasing online conversations have kept many of us away from face to face communication. Likewise we have also become less social in real life. Many of us are still very less outgoing in real life unlike the over extrovertness over the online space. And not every communication can be fruitful to everyone. Online bullying and criminal activities are not new to us.
